The United States is making plans to accept 10,000 Syrian refugees in the coming budget year, a significant increase from the 1,500 migrants that have been cleared to resettle in the U.S. since civil war broke out in the Middle Eastern country more than four years ago, the White House said Thursday.
The White House has been under heavy pressure to do more than just provide money to help meet the humanitarian crisis in Europe.
Tens of thousands of people from war-torn countries in the Middle East and Africa are risking their lives and dying en masse during desperate attempts to seek safe haven on the continent.
The refugees from Syria, however, would be people who are already in the pipeline and waiting to be let into the United States, not the thousands working their way through eastern Europe and landing in Greece.
It was not immediately clear how admitting a larger number of Syrian refugees who are in the processing pipeline would help alleviate the crisis that European countries are grappling with.
White House spokesman Josh Earnest said about $4 billion that the administration has provided to relief agencies and others is the most effective way for the U.S. to help shoulder the crisis, but that President Barack Obama has decided that admitting more Syrian refugees in the budget year that begins Oct. 1 would also help boost the U.S. response.
There's really no way to sugarcoat this, moms and dads - your recent college graduate may be dumber than dirt.
A recent survey showed that nearly ten percent of recent college graduates say that television star Judith Sheindlin is on the Supreme Court.
Yes, friends - our best and brightest seem to think that Judge Judy sits on the highest court in the land.
Parents your child's B.A. may in fact be a bunch of B.S. The American Council of Trustees and Alumni said their survey uncovered a "crisis in American civic education."
The ACTA describes itself as an independent organization committed to academic freedom, excellence and accountability at America's colleges and universities.
Their findings reveal "that recent college graduates are alarmingly ignorant of America's history and heritage."
That could explain why an avowed socialist like Bernie Sanders is giving Hillary Clinton a run for her money.
In its reporting on the study US magazine reports that students could not identify the father of the U.S. Constitution or name one of our First Amendment Rights.
And that could explain a why a frightening number of college students support curbing free speech.
Iran has reportedly found an unexpectedly high reserve of uranium, following assessments that the country is running low on the nuclear raw material and just days after President Obama essentially secured an international nuclear deal with the country's leaders.
The discovery was reported first by Reuters and based on comments made by Iranian nuclear chief Ali Akbar Salehi to the state news agency IRNA.
"I cannot announce (the level of) Iran's uranium mine reserves," Salehi was quoted as saying.
"The important thing is that before aerial prospecting for uranium ores we were not too optimistic, but the new discoveries have made us confident about our reserves."
The international deal with Iran, largely brokered by the Obama administration, slows the country's nuclear development for nearly a decade in exchange for the lifting of billions of dollars worth of crippling economic sanctions.
World leaders think Iran is trying to develop a nuclear weapon, despite Tehran's denial.
However, Iran under the deal will still be able to pursue a nuclear-development program, for which the uranium could be used.
On January 22, for the 43rd year running, pro-Life men, women and children will gather, hundreds of thousands strong, to March for Life and to protest the divisive abortion decree known as Roe v. Wade.
This year's theme is "Pro-Life and Pro-Woman Go Hand in Hand." Why? Planned Parenthood and other abortion proponents falsely claim they are for mothers while we at the March for Life are for babies.
No. We are marching for the unbreakable bond of love between mothers and babies.
A pregnant woman and her baby are not radically separate individuals with isolated human rights "at war" with one another.
A woman and her baby are a "unity of two persons" interconnected in love with everyone and everything.
Whatever harms the baby harms the mother, whatever harms the mother harms the baby, and whatever harms either of them harms us all. Roe v. Wade has enshrined into the law of our nation the false and damaging notion that you can snap the bond of love between a mother and her baby without consequences.
That's simply untrue. You can gnaw at that bond of love through abortion. You can visibly and physically severe the mother's life from the life of her baby.
But invisibly, in the human heart where the hidden truth lies, that silent bond of love remains unbroken and eternal.
We are all well aware of the false rhetorical slogan claiming that the prolife movement has declared a "war on women."
Nothing could be further from the truth. We in the prolife movement have never declared a war.
The Obama administration is declining to inform Congress about the number of American citizens and troops killed by Iran and its terror proxies, according to a document provided to Congress and obtained by the Washington Free Beacon.
The administration was repeatedly asked by Congress to release figures describing how many Americans and Israelis have been killed by Iran's military and terror activities since the country's 1979 revolution.
In a series of on-the-record responses obtained exclusively by the Free Beacon, and provided in written form to Sen. Marco Rubio (R., Fla.), Kerry sidestepped the questions on all of the three separate occasions he was asked to provide the figures.
The questions come as the United States prepares to unfreeze more than $100 billion in Iranian assets under the terms of the recently inked nuclear deal.
Experts fear the Islamic Republic will funnel the cash windfall into its rogue terror operations and proxy groups.
Lawmakers and experts also have expressed concern about portions of the deal that will lift international sanctions on the Iranian Revolutionary Guard Corps (IRGC), as well as Iranian Supreme Leader Ali Khamenei's financial empire.
In the list of questions submitted to Kerry, Rubio asks: "How many U.S. citizens have been killed by Iran, including by Iran's terrorist proxies, since 1979?"
The secretary of state declined to provide an answer, instead saying that the administration takes the murder of American citizens "very seriously."
Forty-three years ago on January 22, the Supreme Court took the issue of abortion out of the people's hands in order to impose its own view.
It swept away the laws of all fifty states, inventing a right to abortion that could not be found in the Constitution.
Even many pro-choice legal scholars have criticized that decision, admitting that the Constitution clearly allows states to enact protections for the unborn.
And so Friday's March for Life is also a march for democracy: for the right to use democratic means to advance justice.
I applaud the marchers, and even more I applaud their noble cause.
I strongly believe that we should build a culture that respects the dignity of all human life from conception to natural death.
As president, I would move, through patient persuasion, toward protecting more and more unborn children from abortion.
Many of my fellow citizens disagree with that goal, of course, but I think most Americans can agree that we should at least protect unborn children at 20 weeks of development, when they may be able to feel pain.
In an age when parents and grandparents post sonogram pictures of their unborn children to their Facebook pages, and modern medicine allows doctors to save premature babies born earlier than we ever thought imaginable, most people understand that these are young lives worthy of our protection.
Nearly all European countries protect children at this late stage of development, and it is time we joined them.
A Texas high school student was punished with in-school suspension last Monday after a teacher discovered he was wearing an American flag T-shirt, FOX 4 reported.
The student, a junior whose name is Jaegur, was wearing the shirt -- which featured an American flag design with an eagle in the foreground -- at Seagoville High School in Dallas when an administrator determined the shirt violated the school dress code.
Jaegur's mom, Shelly Goode, fears the suspension will show up as a permanent mark on his record, ruining any chance her son can earn a scholarship through the ROTC program.
"He wants to go into the military," Goode said, according to FOX 4.
"He wants to help people, and any bad marks doesn't look good."
The T-shirt drama unfolded last Monday when a school administrator asked Jaegur to lift his hoodie, Goode said, according to the station.
Jaegur was told his T-shirt violated the school dress code, and he was ordered to in-school suspension.
At Seagoville High School, students must wear a solid color shirt; there are exceptions for school or college logo shirts or ones supporting the U.S. military, FOX 4 reported.
The school principal, who was not on campus the day of the T-shirt incident, said the administrator misinterpreted the dress code, and apologized to Goode via phone call on Tuesday.
"The fact that acknowledging it is huge, and the fact that they're willing to stand by and see mistakes and grow from them, that means a lot," Goode told The Washington Times.
The principal also told Goode that Jaegur's in-school suspension will not be listed on his permanent record.
I like him personally.
I've been to his office.
I've observed him privately dealing with his staff and people coming inside his building.
He is personally, when the cameras are turned off, an incredibly gracious person.
I know many people who do not believe that because all they see is the public Trump, but when the lights are down, the cameras are turned off, and Donald Trump, not "The Donald," is present, he's a good guy.
Not only that, but as I've mentioned before, Trump Hotels are some of the best I've ever stayed in.
I try never to miss an opportunity to stay in the Trump Chicago and the Trump Hotel on Central Park has generated fond memories for my family.
Donald Trump is not my cup of tea as a candidate.
I'm more into candidates who try to lift us to the better angels of ourselves and I do not think his campaign is doing that right now.
Before I started writing about politics, I worked in politics.
As a rule of thumb, I think anger burns out and it is tough to sustain over time.
Volkswagen says that an internal investigation has revealed that 11 million of its vehicles sold worldwide are fitted with the same software designed to trick emissions testing equipment as the 500,000 vehicles involved in an emerging scandal in the United States.
In a statement, Volkswagen said it "does not tolerate any kind of violation of laws whatsoever."
"It is and remains the top priority of the Board of Management to win back lost trust and to avert damage to our customers."
"The Group will inform the public on the further progress of the investigations constantly and transparently."
On Monday night at an event in New York to unveil the updated 2016 Passat sedan, Volkswagen's US President and CEO, Michael Horn, told the audience that "we have totally screwed up."
In the wake of its statement, VW's share price was down another 17.6 percent at 110.20 euros and near a four-year low.
The fall comes on top of Monday's hefty 17 percent decline and means the company has lost an eye-watering 25 billion euros or so in just two days of frenzied trading.
The trigger to the company's market woes was last Friday's revelation from the U.S.'s Environmental Protection Agency that VW rigged nearly half a million cars to defeat U.S. smog tests.
The company then admitted that it intentionally installed software programmed to switch engines to a cleaner mode during official emissions testing.
The software then switches off again, enabling cars to drive more powerfully on the road while emitting as much as 40 times the legal pollution limit.
There were no votes cast, no startling changes in polls, no fatal gaffes.
Yet last week brought something new and crucial to the often-chaotic presidential campaign: clarity.
On national security and the fight against radical Islam, assumed differences were flushed into the open between President Obama and the Republican field.
For Democrats, clarity comes with the evidence that Hillary Clinton is having serious trouble making the sale.
The week started with a petulant Obama using a State of the Union lecture to come clean about his -casual view of terrorism.
After years of failing to persuade Americans he is serious about combating jihadists, we now know why: He confessed that he's not all that worried about Islamic State or any other terror group.
He scoffed at "over-the-top claims that this is World War III" and insisted that "masses of fighters on the back of pickup trucks and twisted souls plotting in apartments or garages ... do not threaten our national existence."
Despite turning a profit of more than $5 billion over the last year, Boeing plans to lay off up to 300 workers at its satellite assembly plant in El Segundo, Calif. -- and the company's CEO Jim McNerney threatened to move many more jobs out of the United States.
The reason?
Boeing officials are blaming the expired charter of the so-called Export-Import Bank.
President Obama has been urging Congress to reauthorize the bank, saying in July at the White House that, "This should be a no-brainer."
The Ex-Im Bank offers low-interest loan guarantees when foreign companies order American goods.
Boeing is by far the biggest beneficiary.
In 2013, Boeing customers received credit of $8.3 billion, 40 percent of the Ex-Im Bank's loan guarantees that year.
The U.S. Senate passed a bill reauthorizing the Ex-Im Bank, but it hasn't come up for a vote in the House.
The little known lender has become a political football within the Republican Party, pitting Tea Party conservatives against House Speaker John Boehner.
Critics call the bank crony capitalism.
And some, like Kentucky Sen. Rand Paul, are echoing that accusation on the campaign trail.
The federal criminal investigation of former Secretary of State Hillary Clinton's failure to secure state secrets was ratcheted up earlier this week, and at the same time, the existence of a parallel criminal investigation of another aspect of her behavior was made known.
This is the second publicly revealed expansion of the FBI's investigations in two months.
I have argued for two months that Clinton's legal woes are either grave or worse than grave.
That argument has been based on the hard, now public evidence of her failure to safeguard national security secrets and the known manner in which the Department of Justice addresses these failures.
The failure to safeguard state secrets is an area of the law in which the federal government has been aggressive to the point of being merciless.
State secrets are the product of members of the intelligence community's risking their lives to obtain information.
Before she was entrusted with any state secrets -- indeed, on her first full day as secretary of state -- Clinton received instruction from FBI agents on how to safeguard them; and she signed an oath swearing to comply with the laws commanding the safekeeping of these secrets.
She was warned that the failure to safeguard secrets -- known as espionage -- would most likely result in aggressive prosecution.
In the cases of others, those threats have been carried out.
The Obama Department of Justice prosecuted a young sailor for espionage for sending a selfie to his girlfriend, because in the background of the photo was a view of a sonar screen on a submarine.
It prosecuted a heroic Marine for espionage for warning his superiors of the presence of an Al Qaeda operative in police garb inside an American encampment in Afghanistan, because he used a Gmail account to send the warning.
Volkswagen CEO Martin Winterkorn stepped down on Wednesday, succumbing to intense pressure after the German automaker admitted to cheating on U.S. emissions tests.
Winterkorn, who led the 78-year-old company since 2007, came under scrutiny following revelations that nearly half a million of Volkswagen's diesel cars in America skirt clean-air laws.
Volkswagen board members reportedly held a meeting early Wednesday, and anticipation was building for a potential shakeup in leadership.
"As CEO I accept responsibility for the irregularities that have been found in diesel engines and have therefore requested the Supervisory Board to agree on terminating my function as CEO of the Volkswagen Group," Winterkorn said in an announcement.
"I am doing this in the interests of the company even though I am not aware of any wrongdoing on my part."
He also expressed shock that "misconduct on such a scale was possible in the Volkswagen Group."
Shares of the company in Europe regained some ground following the news.
Volkswagen lost $28 billion from its market value on Monday and Tuesday.
Donald Trump, who uses the media as his personal megaphone, has spent this campaign savaging the press for treating him unfairly.
But the crux of his problem all along has been a precinct of the profession that is usually firmly entrenched in the GOP's corner: the conservative media.
And that is why the journalistic coup attempt spearheaded by National Review is so deeply revealing, both of the nature of Trump's candidacy and a cultural divide on the right.
Trump is not running as a true-blue conservative. That is why media reports of the liberal positions he took and Democrats he befriended in the 1990s, a recent staple of Ted Cruz's attacks, have failed to dent his armor.
He presents an amalgam of positions, from a hard-right stance on illegal immigration to a center-left view on protecting entitlement programs to a liberal appeal to tax hedge-fund guys.
Rich Lowry and the editors of National Review are right: The Donald is not their kind of candidate.
He has no interest in that.
He is selling an image of strength and success, packaged with plenty of bombast, that transcends the usual litmus-test politics.
When I interviewed Trump in Las Vegas for Sunday's "Media Buzz," I asked whether he has, through some kind of weird alchemy, become the establishment candidate, as Cruz says.
Trump made no attempt to dispute it, calling the Beltway power brokers "great people" and citing Bob Dole's criticism of the Texas senator.
The Obama administration's release of an Usama bin Laden bodyguard from the Guantanamo detention facility to a Saudi Arabia "rehabilitation program," is being criticized by Arkansas GOP Sen. Tom Cotton.
The detainee, Abdul Shalabi, was returned to his home county after 13 years at the facility, established after 9/11 to get suspected terrorists off the battlefield.
A government review board, which includes military and intelligence officials, determined that detaining Shalabi was no longer necessary, despite assuming he "probably continues to sympathize with extremists."
Shalabi -- a suspected Al Qaeda member connected with other high-ranking group leaders such as Kalid Sheik Muhammad -- was released after a years-long hunger strike.
He was never charged with a crime.
President Obama promised in his 2008 White House bid to close the facility, amid concerns about cost and detainees held without being charged.
The release of this dangerous detainee .".. is another example of President Obama playing politics with national security and putting campaign promises ahead of U.S. national security interests," said Cotton, an Iraq war veteran and outspoken critic of U.S. foreign policy.
The freshman senator also questioned why Defense Secretary Ashton Carter would authorize the release, considering Saudi Arabia's recidivism track record.
Saudi Arabia started the rehabilitation program in 2004, following similar ones in Singapore and Yemen, to try to de-radicalize terrorists through religious teachings and psychological counseling.
The program has largely been considered an overall success. But Saudi officials reportedly said last year that roughly 12 percent of those in the program returned to terror-related activities.
Monday's Supreme Court decision on guns allows citizens to challenge city and state regulations that curtail their Second Amendment right to bear arms.
This is an important ruling because it shores up the Constitution at a time when the Obama administration is testing it in more than one way.
But it is also important psychologically for millions of Americans.
The right to bear arms is a critical component of feeling competent and autonomous as individuals, rather than relying on the goodwill of a super-powerful, unassailable government.
A disarmed population is, by definition, a population that has completely ceded the power to defend its homes against local, state or federal authorities.
This implies a level of trust much more consistent with that which children have for parents than that which thinking adults have for the institutions they have created to perform vital functions like defending the nation, keeping the peace, maintaining schools and providing clean water.
A disarmed population is allowed the toxic luxury of feeling as though our way of life and our safety from oppression comes without the tremendous responsibilities and moral complexities of wielding force.
The same people who passively pay taxes that put tanks on the streets and fighter jets in the skies over our enemies' nations can cringe at the idea of owning guns themselves - projecting their survival instincts onto an all-powerful father figure (the state).
History is replete with examples of cultures in which taking guns away from law-abiding citizens foreshadowed catastrophic abuses of the power thereby invested in government.
One need look no further than Nazi Germany.
Eating meals out in Seattle just got more expensive as tens of thousands of low wage workers got a raise this week to $11 an hour.
It was the first scheduled pay increase on the way to $15 an hour, the highest minimum wage in the country.
Ivar's Salmon House, an iconic Seattle seafood restaurant, decided to skip the phase-in period and began paying $15 right away.
It also raised menu prices 21 percent.
The famous Fish 'n Chips will run you $20.60 and the Wild Alaska Halibut is now $43.50.
The restaurant also wrote on the menu, "Tipping is no longer necessary...we have changed the way we pay our employees."
But that's not all.
In order to keep servers, who used to earn an average of $27 an hour, from quitting, Ivar's is now sharing revenue among all workers.
Owners believe the new formula will have servers and bartenders making the same amount or more money, while dishwashers, cooks and busboys will get a nice pay raise.
Of course, it all depends on the amount of business the restaurant does.
My role in representing the left on Fox News can sometimes feel like David versus Goliath, but in heels.
It's always welcome when I get a tweet or two that doesn't involve "#Dumbacrat" and it's especially heartening when one of two things happen: a conservative reaches out to let me know that I've let a little liberal light into their lives, or when fellow liberals are watching Fox because they know that without understanding the other side we will collectively get nowhere.
But the reality is that as clear a divide as exists between left and right, there is an equal schism within the left amongst those vying for the Democrat nomination.
That is precisely what we saw on stage in South Carolina Sunday night.
Fundamentally, the question is do we see a visionary or absurdist in Bernie Sanders?
And do we see an experienced leader or sell-out in Hillary Clinton?
In a widely praised final State of the Union address, President Obama discussed his primary regret as being that he was unable to fix the partisanship that has been plaguing Washington.
This theme was echoed in Republican South Carolina Governor Nikki Haley's rebuttal.
It's clear that both sides see partisanship as a serious issue that is holding our nation back.
And this is ultimately the reason why a political revolution won't save us - from the left or the right. The system just isn't built that way.
No one challenges Bernie Sanders's authenticity, but there is a very real challenge in getting a candidate elected whose vision is so extreme.
The man picked by President Obama to lead U.S. efforts against ISIS in Iraq and Syria will step down from the position this fall, sources told Fox News Tuesday.
Retired Marine Gen. John Allen, who has held the position as the president's ISIS Czar for a year, is leaving over frustrations with the current U.S. policy in the Middle East as well as his wife being ill with an auto-immune disease, sources said.
Allen has been frustrated with U.S. policy for the past eight months, sources said, who added that he stayed in the position for six months longer than what he originally promised Secretary of State John Kerry.
State Department officials told Bloomberg they were not ready to officially announce Allen's departure, but he notified his superiors he will give up his job in early November.
Allen will be taking a job at the Brookings Institution when he leaves, sources told Fox News.
Last month, the nominee to lead the U.S. Marine Corps told the Senate Armed Services Committee said the war against ISIS was essentially a tie.
Lt. Gen. Robert Neller told Sen. John McCain, R-Ariz., he didn't believe ISIS is winning or losing, but was in a "stalemate."
A year after the U.S.-led air campaign began on Aug. 8, 2014, U.S. intelligence estimates ISIS has 20,000-30,000 fighters, the same number of fighters the CIA estimated last September.
Despite calling the war against ISIS a tie, Neller said in August he would not change the current strategy.
"I think we're doing what we need to do right now," he said.
Movie sequels are rarely as good as the original films on which they're based.
The same dictum, it appears, holds for finance.
The 2008 housing market collapse was bad enough, but it appears now that we're on the verge of experiencing it all again.
And the financial sequel, working from a similar script as its original version, could prove to be just as devastating to the American taxpayer.
The Federal National Mortgage Association (commonly referred to as Fannie Mae) plans a mortgage loan reboot, which could produce the same insane and predictable results as when the mortgage agency loaned so much money to people who had neither the income, nor credit history, to qualify for a traditional loan.
The Obama administration proposes the HomeReady program, a new mortgage program largely targeting high-risk immigrants, which, writes Investors.com, "for the first time lets lenders qualify borrowers by counting income from nonborrowers living in the household. What could go wrong?"
The question should answer itself.
The administration apparently believes that by changing the dirty words "subprime" to "alternative" mortgages, the process will be more palatable to the public.
Before the 2008 housing bubble burst, one's mortgage fitness was supposed to be based on the income of the borrower, the person whose name would be on the deed and who was responsible for making timely monthly payments.
Under this new scheme - and scheme is what it is - the combined income of everyone living in the house will be considered for a conventional home loan backed by Fannie.
Faced with what she called an "impossible choice" to abide by either a federal court order or her conscience, Kentucky clerk Kim Davis said Monday that she would not give her authority to issue marriage licenses in Rowan County.
But, she added, if her deputies felt compelled to act outside of her authority and issue the licenses, she would not stand in the way.
The statement, delivered as the embattled clerk returned to work less than a week after being released from jail, indicated that Davis would not again shut down the marriage licensing functions of her office altogether - as she had done in June, when the U.S. Supreme Court made marriage equality the law of the land.
Because same-sex nuptials conflicted with her Christian faith, Davis refused to issue marriage licenses to any couple - gay or straight - following the justices actions.
But her continued refusal to authorize the issuance of marriage licenses raises even more questions about the validity of any license issued by one of her deputies in Rowan County.
"To affix my name or authoritative title on a certificate that authorizes marriage that conflicts with God's definition of marriage as a union between one man and one woman violates my deeply held religious convictions and conscience," Davis told a crowd of reporters and protesters gathered outside the Rowan County Clerk's office on Monday.
"For me, this would be an act of disobedience to my God."
The heated debate over whether or not to include environmental sustainability in the 2015 dietary guidelines for Americans began nearly a year ago.
In case you missed it: The Dietary Guidelines Advisory Committee called attention to sustainability and the effect of food choices on the environment.
But when the USDA and DHHS released the final guidelines, these issues were off the plate.
A week later, sustainability made it into the State of the Union address.
"No challenge poses a greater threat to our children, our planet, and future generations than climate change," President Obama declared.
But the president's lengthy environmental protection record includes no direct reference to what is arguably the greatest contributor to climate change: the disastrous impact of animal agriculture.
It's time for our government - from the U.S. Department of Agriculture and the Department of Health and Human Services to the White House - to take a stand and address the dismal environmental record of meat and dairy products.
The production of meat and dairy products causes more greenhouse gas emissions - which are linked to climate change - than the production any other foods.
Emissions from beef production are almost 10 times that of potatoes, more than 13 times broccoli, tofu, and beans, and 30 times lentils. Water resources are also impacted.
It takes up to 2,500 gallons of water to produce one pound of beef. And the waste from animal agriculture can pollute waterways.
President Obama on Monday unveiled a new executive order requiring federal contractors to provide paid sick leave, a small but resonant stride in the administration's larger push to humanize some aspects of the American labor market.
Obama promoted the move during a Labor Day trip to Boston, where the president joined union leaders at a rally and breakfast.
In his animated, 30-minute speech, he also renewed his call on Congress to pass the Healthy Families Act, which would provide sick leave to most of the private sector.
That legislation would end America's dubious distinction as the only industrialized country on Earth without a mandatory safety net for workers who need to care for themselves or others.
Monday's executive order will also allow workers to take paid time off to recover from domestic violence, sexual assault or deal with issues related stalking.
The move is the latest in a series of executive actions that the president has used to rewrite the rules of the workplace.
"If I were looking for a good job that lets me build some security for my family, I'd join a union," Obama said Monday at the Greater Boston Labor Council Labor Day Breakfast.
"If I wanted somebody who had my back, I'd join a union."
"Even Brady's happy he's got a union," Obama said of New England Patriots quarterback Tom Brady, whose four-game suspension was upheld by the NFL last week.
"They had his back. So you know if Brady needs unions we definitely need unions."
Bernie Sanders has claimed that if he were to become the Democratic Party's presidential nominee it would be a windfall for his party in down-ballot elections, saying he would energize young people and other base voters who don't regularly show up.
But some operatives tasked with electing Democrats in red and purple states aren't just concerned a Sanders nomination would make an already difficult job impossible - they fear a "nightmare" scenario.
Democrats outside the party's core areas have had a rough eight years under President Obama, losing control not only of both chambers of Congress, but many gubernatorial mansions and state legislatures as well.
The party is counting on 2016, a presidential year when high-turnout favors Democrats, to at least win back the Senate and to begin making gains elsewhere.
You've heard Bernie make the point that Democrats win when there are big turnouts. Republicans win when people are discouraged and don't vote, said spokesperson Michael Briggs.
He's the candidate with the enthusiasm and energy that will help Democrats up and down the ticket win in November.
But several campaign managers and other senior operatives currently working on down-ballot campaigns, all whom spoke only on condition of anonymity, said that while they don't doubt Sanders can drive turnout in liberal areas, he would make life difficult outside blue states.
Instead, they favored front-runner Hillary Clinton, who they said can appeal to more moderate voters and especially those concerned about national security.
"I don't know how you run a campaign in a southern or red state with a democratic socialist at the top of the ticket," said the campaign manager for one red state Democrat.
"It becomes near impossible to separate yourself enough to win over the conservative independents you need to win."
It's a similar warning to the one raised this week by Clinton allies Missouri Gov. Jay Nixon and Rep. Steve Cohen - and people on the ground and in the trenches working to elect Democrats have an even more tactical view.
More than 20 students at a southwestern Virginia high school were suspended Thursday after wearing clothing bearing the Confederate flag in protest of school policy.
Twenty-four students arrived at Christiansburg High School Thursday morning wearing the Confederate flag, which is against the school dress code, Montgomery County Public Schools Spokeswoman Brenda Drake told NBC News.
Drake said the school has a general policy against offensive attire.
Several incidents of "racially motivated behavior" back in 2001 and 2002, specifically related to the Confederate flag, led for the symbol to be banned, she said.
The high school implemented a new policy this year preventing students from displaying the flag or decals with the Confederate iconography on their cars if they wished to park in the school parking lot.
Students must agree in a contract to not display the flag before receiving a school parking pass.
Some students said they wore the flags in protest of the bans.
"They're trying to get rid of it, and they're not trying to get rid of any other flags," student Forrest Taylor told NBC affiliate WSLS.
"They say that it's a racist thing even though it's not."
"It's not racist, I can tell you that right now." Hannah Smith, another student, said.
The student protesters were asked to comply with the school dress code upon entering the school, but 21 of the 24 refused, Drake said.
The bottom is dropping out for Donald Trump.
While Trump was never popular outside of his loyal slice of GOP voters, a raft of new polls show his national position hitting new lows, including with groups that are supposed to form his base.
A collection of recent surveys by Real Clear Politics finds, on average, 30 percent of respondents hold a favorable view of Trump versus 63 percent who hold a negative one.
Those numbers are roughly parallel to former President George W. Bush's approval ratings during his final months in office, which set the stage for President Barack Obama's landslide victory.
America's widespread loathing for Trump puts further pressure on Republican delegates to deny him the nomination in July if he falls short of a majority, a move that would set off an ugly civil war - but one that some in the party believe would be necessary to stave off generational damage.
Trump's worsening position comes after a tumultuous period in which he has faced widespread criticism within his party over his violent rhetoric and, more recently, his attack on Sen. Ted Cruz's wife, Heidi Cruz.
The news has not improved much in recent days, which featured the arrest of Trump campaign manager Corey Lewandoski and Trump's flip flop over "punishment" for women who terminate their pregnancy.
Democratic presidential front-runner Hillary Clinton leads Trump by double digits in at least six national polls in March, even as her own favorability ratings appear weak.
Using 2008 as a reference point again, Obama's popular vote margin against Sen. John McCain was just more than 7 percent.
Larry Sabato's Crystal Ball, a nonpartisan election forecaster affiliated with the University of Virginia's Center for Politics, handicapped the general election based on the latest numbers and the results were not pretty for the GOP.
The Republican-controlled House of Representatives passed on Friday the Defund Planned Parenthood Act, 248-177.
The bill strips the women's health provider of its funding for contraception, pap smears, and testing for sexually-transmitted infections, unless it stops performing abortions.
President Barack Obama has vowed to veto the bill, setting the stage for a possible government shutdown.
Some congressional Republicans have vowed not to vote for any budget that includes funding for the organization.
"Planned Parenthood can get their money back if they fully commit to what they talk about, women's healthcare, and stop performing abortions for this year," said Rep. Diane Black.
Her fellow Republican of Tennessee, Rep. Marsha Blackburn, also a vocal supporter of the bill, declared, "If there is reason to investigate, there is reason to withhold taxpayer funding during that time."
"These false claims against Planned Parenthood have been widely discredited," retorted Rep. Kathy Castor, Democrat of Florida.
"They've edited content out, and they've edited false images in."
Democratic presidential candidate Hillary Clinton has also weighed in.
"The House voting to defund Planned Parenthood is an attack on women's health - nothing more, nothing less. Republicans should be ashamed," she tweeted Friday.
For years the Sierra Club has warned that international trade deals could be used by corporations to undermine U.S. environmental protections.
Now the Canadian oil company TransCanada is attempting to do exactly that in response to President Obama's rejection of its Keystone XL tar sands pipeline.
TransCanada has given new meaning to the phrase "sore loser" by suing the United States for more than $15 billion in "compensation."
The company has launched a lawsuit by using a dangerous provision in the North American Free Trade Agreement (NAFTA) called the investor-state dispute settlement.
NAFTA's investor-state system gives foreign corporations, including big polluters, expansive rights to challenge U.S. environmental protections in unaccountable trade tribunals.
You may have seen investor-state dispute settlement in the news recently - Sen. Elizabeth Warren, Nobel Prize-winning economist Joseph Stiglitz, and many others have warned against its inclusion in the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP), a NAFTA-like U.S. trade deal with 11 Pacific Rim nations that could come before Congress this year.
Like Warren and Stiglitz, the Sierra Club and other environmental groups are concerned about the extreme power that investor-state dispute settlement gives to already deep-pocketed corporations that want to challenge the laws that keep us safe and healthy.
The TPP would grant that power to thousands more foreign corporations - roughly doubling the number of companies that could follow TransCanada's example and challenge U.S. climate and environmental safeguards in private tribunals.
Like NAFTA, the TPP would give foreign corporations like TransCanada broad power to demand compensation for policies that do not conform to their "expectations."
In other words, any time our government takes an "unexpected" step to protect our air, our water, our economy, or the health of our families from dangerous projects like Keystone XL, corporations could use that as a reason to ask a tribunal to order the government to pay.
Former Arkansas governor and 2016 Republican presidential hopeful Mike Huckabee is going after the Obama administration for inviting gay and transgender rights activists to Pope Francis' welcome ceremony in Washington D.C. this week, calling the decision "classless."
Huckabee issued a statement on Monday morning arguing that Obama was turning the pope's visit to the White House into a "politicized cattle call for gay and pro-abortion activists."
The former Baptist pastor asked, "Why is it that Obama goes to extremes to accommodate Muslim terrorists but shows nothing but disdain for Christians? This is a new low for an administration that will go down as the most anti-Christian in American history."
His remarks come following a Wall Street Journal report that the Vatican has taken offense that the Obama administration list of invitees to Wednesday's event include Gene Robinson, the first openly gay Episcopal bishop, Simone Campbell, an activist nun, and Mateo Williamson, a former co-head of the transgender branch of Dignity USA who  advocates for equality within the church.
White House Press Secretary Josh Earnest was asked about the guest list last week - and if Obama was trying to make a political statement.
Earnest, who did not confirm who was on the list, emphasized that up to 15,000 people will be invited to welcome the pope to Washington.
"I would warn you against drawing a lot of conclusions about one or two or maybe even three people who may be on the guest list, because there will be 15,000 other people there too," he said.
ALTOONA, Iowa - In a rare hard-lined stance on the 2016 race, Iowa Gov. Terry Branstad said Tuesday he believes a Senator Ted Cruz caucus victory would be "damaging" to the state.
When asked by NBC affiliate WHO if Governor Branstad hoped that Cruz would be defeated in Iowa in the February 1st Republican caucus, he said, "Yes."
"I think it would be very damaging to the state," he continued.
Branstad, the longest serving governor in American history, has been dogged by questions from reporters for months on the state of the 2016 race, but he has rarely engaged directly.
The state's chief executive has said repeatedly that he will not endorse any candidate before the caucuses.
Branstad appears to have changed his position as Cruz leads the real estate mogul Donald Trump by just three points in the latest Des Moines Register/Bloomberg poll.
"I believe it would be a big mistake for Iowa to support him," Branstad concluded at the Iowa Renewable Fuels Summit.
Cruz indirectly addressed Branstad's statement on Twitter.
Also speaking at the Renewable Fuels Summit, Trump said Branstad's denunciation of Cruz was "amazing," adding that Cruz has been "mixed" on the topic of the renewable fuel standards, a critical issue for Iowa farmers who support the government mandate.
"I agree, I agree. And you know, (Cruz has) been mixed on the subject. He goes wherever the votes are, so he all of a sudden went over here and then all of a sudden he got slapped, so it's very interesting to see," Trump said.
President Barack Obama on Friday announced the nomination of Eric Fanning to be the next Secretary of the Army.
Fanning is openly gay and very active in the LGBT community.
He has been serving as acting undersecretary of the Army since June 2015.
If approved, he would be the first openly gay service secretary.
He temporarily served as acting Secretary of the Air Force several years ago, before the current secretary was approved.
Fanning's nomination is the latest in a series of steps the Obama administration has undertaken to support the rights of gays and lesbians.
His administration has also pushed for greater transgender equality.
Obama's own views on the matter of same-sex marriage have evolved and he has pushed increasingly for issues of gay rights in his second term.
The Pentagon lifted the "don't ask, don't tell" prohibition against openly gay men or women serving in the military two years ago.
Fanning has held senior level positions in the Air Force and Navy and, if confirmed by the Senate, would be charged with helping the Army rebuild dwindled ranks, budgetary strains and address suicides among soldiers who returned from wars in Iraq and Afghanistan.
Ahead of the Wisconsin primary, Donald Trump remains the GOP front-runner, but his support among Republican and Republican-leaners nationally has dropped 3 points to 45 percent, down from 48 percent last week.
Ted Cruz is behind Trump with 28 percent support, and John Kasich has 18 percent support, according to the NBC News|SurveyMonkey Weekly Election Tracking poll conducted online from March 28 to April 3 of 14,071 adults aged 18 and over including 12,116 registered voters.
While Trump is still far ahead of the other candidates, this week's 17-point margin is the smallest between Trump and Cruz since mid-February.
For Trump, it was a contentious news week.
His campaign manager, Corey Lewandowski, was charged with assaulting a reporter.
Trump also told MSNBC's Chris Matthews that if abortions were illegal, women who have them should face "some form of punishment."
His campaign later released a statement walking back the remark.
Even during a controversial week, Trump's national numbers only dipped slightly from last week.
Perhaps surprisingly, his support among women barely dropped from last week. Forty-two percent of women support Trump this week, compared to 45 percent last week.
We'll be watching whether Trump's numbers continue to slip this week.
The Obama administration is pressing forward with plans to reform its family detention policies in the face of mounting criticism calling for the federal government to stop detaining immigrant women and children altogether.
Department of Homeland Security Secretary Jeh Johnson issued a statement late Friday pledging to continue implementing reforms even after a federal court ordered for the government to promptly release families currently in its custody.
"We disagree with portions of the legal reasoning in the decision and have filed a notice of appeal preserving our ability to challenge those portions," Johnson said in the statement.
"But we remain committed to reforming our family residential center policies, as we have been doing for the past several months."
The U.S. Commission on Civil Rights issued a scathing report this week charging that the detention facilities violate immigrant family's civil and due process rights.
The bipartisan commission, made up of presidential and congressional appointees, is calling for DHS to release the women and children immediately and ultimately eliminate immigrant family detention entirely.
"They're not seeking to run away and hide in our country. They're here to be protected, they want their day in court," said chairman Martin Castro, a Democrat appointed by President Obama.
The Obama administration has faced a barrage of backlash for its response to the humanitarian crisis last summer when more than 68,000 young children - and just as many families - were intercepted at the U.S.-Mexico border.
With federal resources too overwhelmed to even process the women and children, the U.S. government soon turned to building two new detention facilities in South Texas to handle the flood of people.
Republican National Committee Chairman Reince Priebus was asked last week which Democratic presidential candidate he'd prefer to face in a general election.
The RNC chief said Bernie Sanders is probably the tougher candidate.
It's obviously difficult to take Priebus' assessment at face value - even if he has a firm opinion, the Republican has no incentive to tell the truth - and his comments are all the more curious given what his party has been up to lately.
During Sunday's Democratic debate, for example, reporters received emails from the candidates' campaigns and their allies, but in a remarkable twist, the Republican National Committee also issued statements - two during the event, two after - defending Sanders against criticisms from Hillary Clinton and endorsing Sanders' arguments.
Bloomberg Politics' Sahil Kapur reported that Republican operatives have "a strange crush on Bernie Sanders," and it goes beyond the RNC's pro-Sanders rapid-response during Sunday night's debates.
Yep, Karl Rove's operation is not only complaining about the bailout his former boss signed into law, Team Rove is also suddenly worried about Wall Street's influence in DC - just like Bernie Sanders.
Or put another way, Reince Priebus can say he sees Sanders as a stronger general-election candidate, but his actions suggest he means the opposite.
In the larger context, the idea of partisans taking steps to choose their own opponent is hardly unprecedented.
Perhaps the best recent example was the 2012 U.S. Senate race in Missouri, when Sen. Claire McCaskill (D) carefully and methodically helped boost then-Rep. Todd Akin (R) in his primary race, confident she could beat him in a general election. (She was right; McCaskill won by over 15 points.)
In other words, Republicans taking steps to help Sanders is hardly unprecedented.
It's electoral mischief, but it's a time-honored tradition.
With just over a week until government funding is set to expire, Senate Democrats blocked a bill that would ban abortions from being conducted on fetuses after 20-weeks of gestation, a time at which supporters of the bill say a fetus can feel pain.
The motion, which needed 60 votes to advance, failed 54-42.
The vote was yet another attempt by GOP leadership to allow Republicans to vote on the topic of abortion ahead of what is expected to be a contentious government funding fight.
Conservative Republicans, led by Sen. Ted Cruz, R-Texas, in that chamber, are calling on their colleagues to block any government funding bill which does not strip federal funding of Planned Parenthood.
Government funding expires at the end of September.
Senate Majority Leader Mitch McConnell, a Republican from Kentucky, told reporters that he sees that strategy as an "exercise in futility," simply because Senate Democrats blocked a measure in August that would move federal funds away Planned Parenthood to women's health clinics that do not provide abortions.
"We are not going to engage in exercises in futility," McConnell told reporters last week, "We've already voted one time in the Senate to try to defund Planned Parenthood."
"We knew the President wouldn't sign such a bill, so it will not succeed."
But that hasn't stopped Cruz, a 2016 Republican presidential candidate, from circulating a letter to fellow Republicans asking for them to sign on to his strategy.
Jeb Bush was asked the other day about his faltering favorability rating among Republican voters.
"Hell if I know," the presidential candidate replied.
"I don't really care."
And at a certain level, that's probably about as a good reply as any.
After all, the underlying question - why don't voters in your own party like you? - is inherently brutal and insulting.
Dismissing it as an unimportant distraction makes sense, if only to maintain one's self-esteem.
But turning a blind eye to a problem does not make the problem go away.
Gallup isn't doing horse-race polling, at least not yet, but it is publishing data on the candidate's favorability, and the longtime pollster published this report last week: Former Florida Gov. Jeb Bush's image among Republicans has steadily worsened over the past five-and-a-half months.
His current net favorable rating of -1 (44% favorable, 45% unfavorable) among Republicans is significantly lower than his +27 (54% favorable, 27% unfavorable) rating in mid-July. [...]
Bush's campaign efforts since July have clearly moved his image in a negative direction.
New York Gov. Andrew Cuomo announced new emergency protections for nail salon workers on Monday, following a bombshell investigation published by The New York Times last week on the working conditions of many nail salon employees.
Last week, The New York Times released a two-part investigative story that went inside the world of nail salons in New York state.
The report featured interviews with dozens of nail salon workers, most of them women of Asian descent who had immigrated to the U.S.
The workers spoke of long hours, poor working conditions and wages so far below the minimum wage that most manicurists can barely make ends meet.
Many of the workers described being asked to pay $100 to secure a job, working unpaid for weeks until their bosses determined they were good enough to merit a wage, and then still only receiving meager wages a day.
Some salons described in the story paid workers as little as $10 for a long day's work.
Some workers also described experiencing health issues and miscarriages as a result of being exposed to chemicals in nail salons for long periods of time.
The new protections ordered by Cuomo go into effect immediately, and they are designed to crack down on salons and help workers secure lost wages and better working conditions.
"New York State has a long history of confronting wage theft and unfair labor practices head on and today, with the formation of this new Enforcement Task Force, we are aggressively following in that tradition," Cuomo said in a statement.
Last July, Sen. John McCain, a decorated hero of the Vietnam War, called on Republican presidential candidate Donald Trump to apologize to military families for insulting McCain's service in Vietnam.
During the war, McCain's plane was shot while he flew a combat mission, and he was severely injured almost to the point of death.
He was then captured, tortured and spent more than five years as a prisoner of war.
He declined to use his father's high rank in the Navy to gain an early release from prison.
Trump believes that McCain should not be considered a hero because he was captured.
"I like people that weren't captured," Trump jeers.
Now, Trump, who chose not to serve his country in Vietnam, is trying to use his tangential military connections to inspire people to vote for him.
On the campaign stump, Trump touts his high school years at the New York Military Academy (NYMA) as having "prepared me to be a great leader."
Selfish, self-centered and self-serving, Trump is the very antithesis of the men and women who sacrifice so much - sometimes their lives - to serve in our armed forces.
Could Trump have received the kind of leadership training that he claims to have had at NYMA?
When Pope Francis talks to Congress on Thursday, he's expected to dwell on the subject of dangerous, man-made climate change, which just so happens to be an issue that most of his audience believes is bogus.
That makes for an unusually pure clash between God and politics, and a test of which is the greater force in American life.
So far, it doesn't look good for God.
Back in June, His deputy here on earth emerged as an environmentalist, publishing a 184-page defense of "our common home," and calling for a "cultural revolution" to save it.
Pope Francis framed climate change as a moral issue, landing direct blows against everyone who is blockading action, denying the science, or hiding behind cherry-picked passages in the Bible.
But although the document was hailed as game-changer, there's almost no evidence so far that the game of climate change politics has changed.
Religious and conservative Americans remain almost uniformly unmoved by the Pope's appeals for the planet, polls show, and it may take a papal miracle to change the mind of a member of Congress.
Rep. Paul Gosar of Arizona isn't taking a chance.
In an op-ed last week, he announced that he'd be boycotting Pope Francis's appearance in Washington.
Although Gosar is a self-described "proud Catholic" who lives in a state that can't really tolerate any more heat, he doesn't want to hear his religious leader talk about global warming.
After the triumphs of 2014 - when the world's first completely legal cannabis markets debuted in Colorado and Washington - 2015 was a relatively quiet year in marijuana reform.
In the history of the plant, however, it may also figure as a tipping point.
This was a hinge year for a drug that's already used by about 20 million Americans a month.
Marijuana remains a controlled substance under federal law, and it's illegal to use it, produce it, or sell it in most states.
So, the subject of fierce debate in 2015 - and the big question for the year ahead - is simply this one: Should marijuana users and their providers be treated as criminals or warmly embraced as consumers and capitalists?
Americans have been mulling this question for decades, inching closer and closer to the free market perspective.
But while 2015 may go down as a tipping point, it's still unclear which side the nation will tip towards.
Reformers are full of confidence.
Four states have legalized recreational marijuana since President Obama came to office, committing themselves to a regulated adult market, much like the markets for alcohol and tobacco.
This number could easily double by the time Obama leaves office, which is credit to groups like the Marijuana Policy Project and Drug Policy Alliance.
In Nevada, marijuana legalization is already guaranteed a spot on the ballot next November.
California is closing in on the same milestone.
Donald Trump came under fire Friday morning for his handling of a question at a town hall about when the U.S. can "get rid" of Muslims, for failing to take issue with that premise and an assertion that President Barack Obama is Muslim.
Trump, who has shaken off several high-profile controversies that would have ended other presidential campaigns, faced an immediate backlash from advocacy groups, and members of his own party distanced themselves from the GOP front-runner.
The incident recalls Trump's 2011 quest to challenge Obama on where he was born, which ended with Obama releasing his long-form birth certificate.
It also follows a debate performance Wednesday that garnered mixed reviews for the billionaire businessman.
"We have a problem in this country. It's called Muslims," an unidentified man who spoke at a question-and-answer town hall event in Rochester, New Hampshire asked the mogul at a rally Thursday night.
"You know our current president is one. You know he's not even an American."
A seemingly bewildered Trump interrupted the man, chuckling, "We need this question. This is the first question."
"Anyway, we have training camps growing where they want to kill us," the man, wearing a "Trump" T-shirt, continued.
"That's my question: When can we get rid of them?"
"We're going to be looking at a lot of different things," Trump replied.
"You know, a lot of people are saying that and a lot of people are saying that bad things are happening. We're going to be looking at that and many other things."
The real estate mogul did not correct the questioner about his claims about Obama before moving on to another audience member.
It's widely believed that the Democratic National Committee has done its best to restrict the number of debates -- and tonight it became obvious why.
Hillary Clinton was outperformed by Bernie Sanders, who embarrassed the establishment favorite and helped drive the Democrats further to the left.
The man's anger is raw and pure.
I have a long list of utility companies I'd love him to call on my behalf.
Sanders kept returning to the theme of campaign finance reform as a way of driving a wedge between himself and Clinton.
It underscores Bernie's outsider status and gives him a "golden bullet" policy -- an answer to all of America's problems that's as understandable and straightforward as Donald Trump's wall.
Sanders deployed it best when pointing out that Clinton has received speaker's fees from Goldman Sachs.
This is true.
Last year, CNN reported that: "Clinton made $3.15 million in 2013 alone from speaking to firms like Morgan Stanley, Goldman Sachs, Deutsche Bank and UBS."
But while most of America would agree that special interest politics is bad and Wall Street too powerful, the rest of the discussion in South Carolina was way to the left of mainstream opinion.
For the first 30 minutes, each candidate pledged to raise spending, reduce access to guns and crack down on alleged racism in the criminal justice system.
Congressional Republicans hope Pope Francis leaves his liberal-leaning views at the Vatican.
When he addresses a joint session of Congress Thursday during an event that will be broadcast around the world, a large number of House and Senate Republicans want the leader of the Catholic Church to keep a lid on his progressive attitudes on climate change, immigration, guns and capitalism.
In interviews with CNN, a wide array of GOP lawmakers argued that the Pope's message should stay away from the political fights consuming Washington, and many expressed strong disapproval of the fiery views he's espoused since taking over the papacy in 2013.
"I think it's totally inappropriate that the Pope is weighing in on all the real sensitive, far-left issues," said Oklahoma Republican James Inhofe, one of the most conservative senators.
"I'm not a Catholic, but my Catholic friends in Oklahoma are not real pleased with it."
Rep. Paul Gosar, a Catholic Republican from Arizona, plans to boycott the event.
"I don't need to be lectured by the Pope about climate change," Gosar said in an interview off the House floor.
"When he wants to take a political position, I will tell you: He is free and clear to be criticized like the rest of us."
This week's big news on race is that Ta-Nehisi Coates has called out Sen. Bernie Sanders for failing to adequately oppose white supremacy.
Coates' piece in The Atlantic advocating reparations for black America was widely praised in 2014, and his book last year "Between the World and Me" has been a sensation, with Toni Morrison anointing Coates as today's James Baldwin.
Coates is dismayed that nevertheless, Sanders has dismissed the idea of trying to get Congress to pass a reparations bill as futile and also "divisive."
To Coates, this means that Sanders is part of the problem that black America has had since the early 17th century.
However, Coates' attack on Sanders is premised on a weakness in his general take on black history, which, while charismatically expressed, is vastly oversimplified.
Coates' version of black history is that black problems, including anything others might see as problems with our culture, are traceable to evils that whites imposed on us in the past.
If not lynching, then slavery, Jim Crow, redlining, and so on.
Surely legacies matter, but this analysis wears decidedly thin in places.
Coates is hardly alone, for example, in demanding that America accept that when legions of black teenagers shoot each other over sneakers and turf, the real reason, on some level, is white racism.
However, the onus is on Coates and his confreres to make that case and make it stick.
It never seems to work in terms of creating a meaningful consensus, and racism is not the sole reason for that.
Industry and congressional sources say they're prepared for President Barack Obama to reject the Keystone XL oil pipeline soon, even as details on how and when the White House will rule on the controversial project remain unknown.
With concrete information from the administration scarce, the pipeline's proponents instead view the lengthy review process, initiated by President George W. Bush and continued under Obama, as having now taken so long that an affirmative outcome appears unlikely.
The pipeline, which would transport oil from the tar sands of Canada to the Gulf of Mexico, is fiercely opposed by environmentalists who say it would only augment Americans' reliance on fossil fuels.
Obama has taken several new steps to reduce dependence of those fuels in the past several months, including issuing a final rule curbing carbon emissions from power plants by 32% in fifteen years.
At the end of August, he is slated to make another push to bring attention to climate change, first addressing a green energy summit in Las Vegas and later traveling to the Alaskan Arctic underscore the effects climate change are having in the region.
His moves all come ahead of a December climate summit in Paris, where Obama hopes to laud carbon reduction commitments from other nations.
Those efforts, paired with Obama's past statements downplaying the energy benefits of the pipeline, haven't fostered much confidence among proponents that the project will be approved.
For decades I chose silence.
Like many other women in the shadows of the contentious debate over abortion rights in America, I chose not to tell the world about my deeply personal decision to end a pregnancy.
But two years ago I joined a growing number of women who are breaking that silence.
Together, we are choosing to fight stigma and judgment by telling our stories to friends and family, to the press and the public and -- most recently -- to the U. S. Supreme Court.
My story begins when I had a medically necessary termination of a nonviable ectopic pregnancy.
And then, even more heart-wrenching, I made the decision to terminate a much-wanted pregnancy, when, during my second trimester, my then-husband and I discovered that our baby daughter was suffering from a debilitating brain abnormality.
Distraught, we turned to four different doctors seeking some sliver of hope that she could live a sustainable life.
Instead, each confirmed what we had already been told: She would likely not survive delivery.
Even if she did, the life she lived would be one of suffering.
Guided by our doctors and held together by our faith and prayers, we made a decision to spare her the suffering we knew was inevitable.
The grief that followed was indescribable, but never did we regret our decision.
Pope Francis on Tuesday radically revised the process by which Catholics may annul their marriages, streamlining steps that many in the church considered too cumbersome and costly.
The move is the latest in a series of reforms by Francis as he seeks to make the church more responsive to the real needs of lay Catholics, especially those who have long felt marginalized by the hierarchy.
Without the annulments, Catholics who remarry are not allowed to receive Holy Communion, which many describe as a painful exclusion from the church's chief sacrament.
The Vatican announcement also comes just weeks before Francis makes his first-ever visit to the United States.
Americans accounted for about half of the nearly 50,000 annulments granted in 2012, the latest year for which statistics are available.
"This move is in accord with the Pope's oft-repeated image of the Church as a 'field hospital' that goes out to meet people where they are most in need, and then to treat their most serious wounds first -- rather than stay at home and wait for people to come to them," said the Rev. James Bretzke, an expert on papal affairs at Boston College.
Donald Trump has one "yuge" problem standing in the way of winning the GOP presidential nomination: Donald Trump.
What do I mean?
Well the key to Trump's success so far has been his inflammatory comments and outlandish proposals that have garnered him tons of free media coverage and translated into great poll numbers.
But Trump knows -- just as his kindred spirits Miley Cyrus and Justin Bieber do -- that if you want to keep people talking about you, then you need to outdo your last stunt.
In Trump's case, however, how much more provocative can he get given what we have already seen from him?
The Donald kicked off his presidential campaign calling Mexican immigrants "rapists" and vowing to force Mexico to pay to build a massive wall along our nation's southern border.
Trump then vowed to deport about 11 million undocumented immigrants in the country despite experts noting it would be logistically impossible and cost north of $100 billion.
Trump went on to mock prisoners of war such as John McCain for getting caught by the enemy and even defended his white supporters beating up a black activist at a recent campaign event.
Recently, Trump unleashed his jihad on Muslims that started out with vowing to close mosques and slowly built to a crescendo with his declaration to ban all Muslims from entering the United States.
The result has been Trump grabbing headlines worldwide and seeing a bump in the GOP polls.
Pharmaceutical company Turing increased the price of a drug called Daraprim from $13.50 to $750 a pill and its CEO, Martin Shkreli, quickly became the focus of public anger.
The over 4,000% increase also caught the eye of Hillary Clinton.
She tweeted about it Monday, saying she wanted to put an end to drug "price gouging."
The Daily Beast declared Shkreli the "most-hated man in America," surpassing the dentist who killed Cecil the Lion.
Shkreli says he has heard the outcry.
"We've agreed to lower the price of Daraprim to a price that is more affordable," Shkreli said on ABC World News Tonight.
He didn't say what that "affordable" price would be, but stressed that the company already gives away the drug for free to about half the patients who use it and that Turing plans to expand its charitable drug program.
Shkreli has been defending himself on Twitter and in numerous TV interviews.
"We needed to turn a profit on the drug," Shkreli told Bloomberg, arguing that companies that owned the drug before were giving it away at $13.50.
With megastorm Jonas bearing down on the East Coast, New Jersey Gov. Chris Christie first told reporters he didn't plan to leave the presidential campaign trail in New Hampshire to return home.
Then he had a timely change of heart and said he planned to skedaddle back to the state before the storm threatened to bury not only his state, but his political future.
Smart move.
Back in 2010, Christie came under fire for remaining on vacation -- in Disney World, of all places -- rather than rushing back home when a major snowstorm hit the northeast.
Christie suffered no lasting political damage from the incident, winning re-election in 2013.
But he had to know the long, grim history of politicians who paid the price for bungling a winter cleanup.
Start with the legendary February 1969 blizzard that slammed New York City with 15 inches of snow and nearly destroyed the career of then-Mayor John Lindsay.
Neighborhoods distant from City Hall were left buried for at least three days; food deliveries were so snarled that helicopters air-dropped food in neglected areas.
One prominent resident, Ralph Bunche, a Nobel Peace Prize winner and undersecretary-general of the United Nations, actually sent a telegram to the mayor about being unable to get to work.
"As far as getting to the United Nations is concerned, I may as well be in the Alps," Bunche wrote.
"This is a shameful performance by the great city of New York."
Office of Personnel Management Director Katherine Archuleta resigned Friday, a day after revealing that the recent data breach of government computers was vastly larger than originally thought.
Archuleta confirmed her departure in an email to OPM staff.
"I write to you this afternoon to share that earlier today, I offered and the President accepted my resignation as the Director of the U.S. Office of Personnel Management," she wrote.
"Leading this agency and serving with all of you has been the highlight of my career."
Starting Saturday, Beth Cobert, currently the U.S. chief performance officer and a deputy director at the Office of Management and Budget, will take over as acting director of OPM.
Archuleta acknowledged Thursday that her agency had discovered in April that hackers had breached sensitive personnel databases and had stolen the personal data of 22.1 million current, former and prospective U.S. government employees and their family members.
Support for Archuleta crumbled after her testimony.
But she had never received a thorough vetting of her qualifications for the job.
When she won Senate confirmation to lead the Office of Personnel Management, the chief objections from lawmakers who voted against her focused on Obamacare.
That was October 2013, and the 62-35 vote reflected the political concerns at the time about how the agency, which serves as the federal government's HR department, would implement parts of the health care law opposed by Republicans.
The American people are being bombarded with messages suggesting this country is under siege -- whether it is from immigrants and refugees, or American Muslims or some other segment of the U.S. population.
Many have weighed in attempting to address the ignorance that underpins much of the fear and hate being expressed.
Indeed, there are no shortage of facts underscoring how the Islamic State of Iraq and Syria's repulsive actions do not represent Islam, or why Hispanic-Americans are some of the most law-abiding and productive citizens in this country.
Yet the drums of intolerance beat on, unrelenting.
There are, for example, cases of American Sikhs being singled out or discriminated against for their religious garb.
There are also some troubling statistics on how Hispanic-Americans avoid social services like health care for fear it will place them in the crosshairs of vague but threatening immigration proposals.
And there are groups delivering guidance to American Muslim women on how to remain safe amid an anti-Islamic atmosphere, including swapping the entirely benign hijab for a hooded sweatshirt.
There is a particular madness to the idea that we have reached the point where a head scarf, a full beard or even a family name engenders so much animosity -- animosity that is leading to hate crimes and anti-religious and ethnic violence.
Most troubling is that the volume and frequency of these incidents seems to be increasing.
I mapped out reports of discrimination, violence or threats of violence against Muslims, Sikhs and other minorities for last November and December, and found incidents across the country.
A U.S. official told CNN Thursday that Russian fighter jets turned off their transponders as they flew into Syria in an apparent attempt to avoid detection.
The official said the fighters flew very close to a transport plane that had its transponder on and functioning.
U.S. satellites rapidly saw that the aircraft were there, according to the official.
The assessment over the weekend was that the fighter jets were on their way.
The same official said the Russians have begun flying drones around the coastal city of Latakia.
With no ISIS fighters in the area, the move raises serious questions about the Russians' intentions with their military buildup, which the U.S. has questioned the purpose of and watched with wariness.
The action points to a higher likelihood that the Russian plan is to prop up Syrian President Bashar al-Assad rather than fight the terror group.
The U.S. has its own effort underway to defeat ISIS but has also said that Assad must go.
Asked about what the U.S. can do about the situation, Defense Secretary Ashton Carter told CNN at a press conference Thursday that "it's a matter of seeing what the Russians do."
Carter said he hopes the Russians will fight ISIS, "but if it's a matter of pouring gasoline on the civil war in Syria, that is certainly not productive from our point of view."
In 2008, Republicans faced a choice.
America had just elected a Democratic president.
The Senate was majority-Democratic.
The House of Representatives had more Democrats than at any time since 1992.
The Republicans could either change themselves -- by embracing the young, diverse and tolerant America of the 21st century -- or they could try to change whose voices count in our democracy.
We all know the cynical path they chose.
Six years ago Thursday, the Supreme Court's decision in Citizens United transformed our politics by allowing corporations to spend unlimited amounts of money to influence elections.
The effect was immediate.
In the 2010 midterms, outside groups spent nearly 60% more than in 2006.
In 2014, the top 100 donors spent nearly as much as all 4.75 million small donors combined.
National networks of big-money donors funneled mountains of cash into targeted state races.
House Speaker John Boehner is resigning his position as the top House Republican and his seat in Congress at the end of October, a senior leadership aide said Friday.
Boehner announced his decision to colleagues Friday morning, sharing the news with House Republicans during a closed-door conference meeting.
The abrupt decision comes after he faced heavy pressure from conservatives in his party to take a harder line on their causes, most recently over defunding Planned Parenthood.
Boehner, who has served as House Speaker since 2011, explained during the closed-door meeting that he had only planned to serve two terms as speaker but decided to hold onto his post after then-House Majority Leader Eric Cantor lost his seat during a primary last year, a Republican lawmaker in the room told CNN.
Boehner also told the lawmakers that Pope Francis' visit to Congress the day before was a crystallizing moment, according to the lawmaker.
Boehner's decision came as a shock to many, with his top deputy House Majority Leader Kevin McCarthy finding out moments before.
A top Boehner aide told CNN the Speaker did not make his final decisions until Thursday night and was very emotional when he announced the news.
"After yesterday with the Pope he decided to leave on this high note," the aide said.
"Literally did not make the decision til last night."
Rep. Greg Walden, a member of Boehner's House leadership, said he had no idea Boehner would announce his resignation this morning and called it a "terrible loss for the party."
Difficult times occasionally summon great leadership.
Yet somehow, many in the GOP confuse macho talk with leadership, imagining that bluster is enough.
Chris Christie as well as Jeb Bush and others have gone after Marco Rubio incessantly on this point, implying that the junior senator from Florida is some kind of sissy.
"This is a first-term senator who still is learning where the men's room is in the Senate, let alone figuring out how to lead a country," Christie told Fox News.
Bush made fun of Rubio's fancy boots with their pointy toes and heels, bragging: "I don't have a height issue."
Rubio has responded to the implication he is not tough or tall enough with an almost comic machismo.
Indeed, he went into a gun store on Christmas Eve as he informed a crowd in Iowa the other day.
He just couldn't wait to get his hands on a gun.
Only real men buy guns on the eve of the birth of the prince of peace.
This in itself is dismaying.
But it only gets worse.
When gay activist Ram Rao came back to India from London in June 2014, he was eager to be reunited with his childhood friend.
Instead, he found a cold businessman who didn't want anything to do with him.
He said his friend told him that he couldn't be seen with him because he didn't want to ruin his reputation.
Rao works at the Naz Foundation Trust, a non-profit organization that works on HIV/AIDS issues in Delhi and says he returned to live in a society steeped in fear.
But he was hopeful that the Supreme Court could potentially change that.
On Tuesday, the court heard a challenge to Section 377, a colonial-era law that criminalizes sex between consenting lesbian, gay, bi-sexual and transgender (LGBT) partners.
On Tuesday, the court heard a challenge to Section 377, a colonial-era law that criminalizes sex between consenting lesbian, gay, bi-sexual and transgender (LGBT) partners.
The statute was ruled unconstitutional in 2009, but re-enacted in 2013 by the Supreme Court.
LGBT advocates immediately filed a petition for a review after that decision.
A panel of three judges has now referred the petition within the Supreme Court said Anand Grover, lawyer for the Naz Foundation Trust, one of the petitioners.
Alexander Litvinenko wasn't the first critic of Vladimir Putin to end up dead, and he won't be the last.
In March 2003 -- three years before the former Russian spy was poisoned in a London hotel -- the Kremlin issued a directive that authorized the assassination of individuals living abroad who were deemed to be "enemies of the state," according to a secret document posted on the website of the UK public inquiry into Litvinenko's death.
Since then, a number of Kremlin critics have died in mysterious circumstances around the world -- several of them on British soil.
The UK government's reaction to the murder of Litvinenko in 2006 was shockingly insufficient.
Britain expelled four Russian diplomats and suspended ties with the Russian security services, which resumed again during the Sochi Winter Olympics.
Most shockingly, Home Secretary Theresa May desperately tried to block a government inquiry into Litvinenko's killing because, in her view, it would harm diplomatic relations with Russia.
And a public inquiry only took place because of a British High Court ruling overriding May's attempts to silence the whole affair.
When you consider the circumstances of Litvinenko's murder -- his tea spiked with radioactive polonium-210 in a Mayfair hotel during a meeting with two former Russian security servicemen - this shamefully deficient reaction of the UK government put public safety at risk.
The victims of this crime were not just Litvinenko and his family.
Traces of polonium-210 were found across London -- including at the Millenium Hotel, the Emirates football stadium, an Itsu sushi restaurant, and two planes at Heathrow airport.
Approximately 700 people were tested for radioactive poisoning.
Shell said Monday that it would end offshore drilling in Alaska for the foreseeable future after a key exploration well did not yield sufficient amounts of oil and gas.
The decision to shelve the controversial project is a victory for environmentalists, who were concerned about possible ecological damage caused by the drilling.
For Shell, it's an acknowledgment that plummeting energy prices have made even the world's most promising exploration projects financially difficult.
Shell continues to "see important exploration potential in the [petroleum] basin, and the area is likely to ultimately be of strategic importance to Alaska and the U.S.," Marvin Odum, director of Shell Upstream Americas, said in a statement.
"However, this is a clearly disappointing exploration outcome for this part of the basin."
The company said it took into consideration the project's high cost and the "unpredictable federal regulatory environment in offshore Alaska" in deciding to stop the exploration.
Shell said it will take a financial charge as a result of the decision.
Shell received approval to drill in the Chukchi Sea in May.
The company said the well, called the Burger J, is situated about 150 miles from Barrow, Alaska, in 150 feet of water.
The company said it would "continue to safely de-mobilize people and equipment from the Chukchi Sea."
The Burger J well will be sealed and abandoned.
In recent months, Pakistani officials have boasted of major counterterrorism successes.
They cite, for example, the scores of militants killed in an ongoing military operation in the North Waziristan tribal area, and point to the considerable reductions in terrorist violence.
And it's true that last year, the number of civilian deaths from terrorist violence was down about 50% from 2014.
Still, let's be clear: Despite the counterterrorism triumphs over the last year, militancy has not been muzzled in Pakistan, a reality made painfully clear on Wednesday morning, when terrorists stormed Bacha Khan University in the town of Charsadda in northwestern Pakistan, killing at least 19 people.
It would also be wrong to suggest that the Bacha Khan University attack shattered a relative lull in terrorist violence.
On the contrary, it came soon after two other mass casualty attacks elsewhere in the country -- one on a government office and the other at an outdoor market.
None of this should be surprising.
Pakistan may be killing off terrorists on the battlefield, but it has not killed off the ideology that fuels them.
Indeed, the reality is that the Pakistani state has failed to craft a counternarrative to combat the hardline rhetoric deeply entrenched in Pakistani society.
This ideology emphasizes themes of Islam being under siege, and of India and the United States as being responsible for Pakistan's afflictions.
Janet L. Yellen, the Federal Reserve chairwoman, faces a crucial moment on Thursday when the Fed's policy-making committee announces whether the time has come to start raising interest rates.
Liberal activists, economists and some policy makers are pressing hard for Ms. Yellen to continue the Fed's stimulus campaign of near-zero rates because the economic recovery remains far from complete, leaving most Americans still struggling to pay their bills on stagnant incomes.
At the same time, Ms. Yellen faces growing internal pressure to start raising rates from Fed officials who are concerned about froth in financial markets and about maintaining control of inflation.
Analysts say the decision will further sharpen Ms. Yellen's priorities as perhaps the most powerful economic official in the world.
"They are paying a lot more attention to the labor market than in the past," said William Spriggs, chief economist at the A.F.L.-C.I.O.
"I know it's in the Fed's thinking. I know it concerns them. I just hope that it's deep enough a part of their equation that they wait to see real progress happen."
Turn away, for a moment, from the generalized idiocy of the presidential campaign to consider a specific instance of monumental dimness.
It happened Wednesday.
The National Border Patrol Council, which says it represents 16,500 border agents, endorsed Donald Trump.
It says it has never endorsed a presidential candidate in a primary before, but these are dire times.
"There is no greater physical or economic threat to Americans today than our open border," says the endorsement, signed by the council's president, Brandon Judd.
The union "asks the American people to support Mr. Trump in his mission to finally secure the border of the United States of America, before it is too late."
Too late for what? The collapse of America, apparently, from the "gangs, cartels and violent criminals preying on the innocent."
It's tempting to dismiss this as the usual politicized cop-talk, par for today's course.
But it's far more dangerous and fraudulent than that.
The lies behind it have preoccupied the country for a generation, consuming billions of dollars for miles of walls, razor wire, drones, sensors and a surge of agents and troops.
Flooded with homeless encampments from its freeway underpasses to the chic sidewalks of Venice Beach, municipal officials here declared a public emergency on Tuesday, making Los Angeles the first city in the nation to take such a drastic step in response to its mounting problem with street dwellers.
The move stems partly from compassion, and in no small part from the rising tide of complaints about the homeless and the public nuisance they create.
National experts on homelessness say Los Angeles has had a severe and persistent problem with people living on the streets rather than in shelters - the official estimate is 26,000.
The mayor and City Council have pledged a sizable and coordinated response, proposing Tuesday to spend at least $100 million in the next year on housing and other services.
They plan, among other things, to increase the length of time shelters are open and provide more rent subsidies to street people and those in shelters.
"Every single day we come to work, we see folks lying on this grass, a symbol of our city's intense crisis," Mayor Eric Garcetti said at a news conference at City Hall on Tuesday.
This city has pushed this problem from neighborhood to neighborhood for too long, from bureaucracy to bureaucracy.
As the fraught Syria peace talks inch forward in Geneva, the United States finds itself with little leverage to help negotiate an end to a conflict that has left almost a quarter of a million people dead and helped fuel the worst refugee crisis since World War II.
But there's an efficient way for Washington to put pressure on Damascus: Offer money and asylum to officers and officials who defect from the criminal regime of President Bashar al-Assad
Discontent among Alawites - the minority sect that forms the regime's core constituency - as well as Druse and other religious minorities is at its highest since 2012, when dozens of Mr. Assad's senior military and security officials left the government.
Last summer, simmering tensions reportedly boiled over when gun battles erupted between Iranian-backed regime forces and residents of two Alawite villages outside Hama.
In September, Druse protesters and paramilitaries overtook a government building in the southern province of Sweida and even destroyed a statue of Hafez al-Assad, Mr. Assad's father.
Over the course of the revolution, about 3,000 Syrian officers have jumped ship, according to a report by the Free Syrian Army.
A vast majority now live in refugee camps in Turkey and Jordan, where they perform odd jobs or rely on host countries or the thinly stretched Syrian opposition for their daily bread.
But not enough have left, largely because this enormous decline in quality of life discourages additional desertions, in particular from high-level generals who could help force a political solution.
Money and legal assistance from the United States could change that.
I know firsthand that Mr. Assad's deputies would take advantage of this fund.
Employers added 142,000 jobs in September, the Labor Department said on Friday, spurring concerns about the American economy's momentum after the lackluster report for the previous month.
The official unemployment rate held steady at 5.1 percent.
The report for August was revised, showing the economy created only 136,000 jobs, down from 173,000.
The report came just two weeks after the Federal Reserve decided that the recovery was still too frail to risk lifting interest rates from their near-zero level.
The Fed chairwoman Janet L. Yellen, who nonetheless said she expected a rate increase before year's end, explained that fears about continuing weakness in the labor market as well as slow growth abroad nudged the central bank to delay any move.
Diane Swonk, chief economist at Mesirow Financial, noted in an analysis before the report's release that "it would be more reassuring if we could see a point where the economy is truly firing on all cylinders for a change."
"The places to look for sparks," said Andrew Chamberlain, chief economist at Glassdoor Economic Research, "are in industries like professional and business services, health care, and travel and leisure (where automation cannot take the place of servers and maids)."
The need to collect, manage and report information along with the expansion of mobile apps in health care and other sectors is also propelling job growth in high technology.
The conditions on the ground in Flint still do not seem to have sunk in at the Michigan statehouse.
Thousands of residents are still relying on trucked-in water, as if they were in a war-zone refugee camp, while worrying that their children may suffer developmental and other health problems from a water system poisoned by lead.
Gov. Rick Snyder has been busy apologizing, but the tiny steps he is taking to repair the damage shrink beside the urgency of the problem.
The challenge now is to replace the corroded pipes or perhaps the whole water system in this city of nearly 100,000 as quickly as it can be done.
The cost may reach $1 billion or more, but that cannot stand in the way of moving forward to make the city fit for habitation.
No Americans should have to live with poisoned water that is a direct result of the government's decisions and neglect.
Mr. Snyder and officials who work for him first wasted time trying to shift blame for the catastrophe to the city - at least until an independent task force and internal emails released last week showed that the state was responsible.
Now he is wasting more time by maneuvering to get out of paying the bill for the huge repairs project.
The state's claims of limited resources to start replacement or repairs of the water system do not even hold up.
Michigan has a budget surplus of $575 million this year that could surely be applied to this crisis of its own making, and if that's not enough, the governor could always raise taxes in a special levy.
In early September, the State Department gave exciting news to tens of thousands of highly skilled legal immigrants in the United States who had been stuck for years in visa backlogs, waiting for green cards.
On Oct. 1, they would take a big step forward along the path to their documents, a department bulletin said.
Then, just as suddenly and with no explanation, the department reversed course Sept. 25, sending most of the immigrants - including many people from India and China with advanced degrees and professional careers in the United States - back to where they had been in slow-moving visa lines, dashing their hopes and disrupting their lives.
The problem was that immigration officials realized belatedly that they did not have enough green card visas, which are limited by yearly quotas, for all the immigrants they had allowed to apply for them, Obama administration officials said.
"It was a devastating blow for the workers and their families with skills we are trying to retain in the United States," said Lynden Melmed, a lawyer at Berry, Appleman and Leiden in Washington, who was formerly general counsel of the Department of Homeland Security agency that administers immigration with the State Department.
Immigrants who were affected filed a federal lawsuit in Seattle, accusing the administration of "arbitrary and capricious action" that cost them millions of dollars.
The bait-and-switch was also a new setback for President Obama's efforts to make fixes to immigration through executive actions he announced last November.
The discovery of what looks like the aftermath of a brutal clash between two groups of prehistoric hunter-gatherers on the shore of an African lake is certain to stir up a debate about human nature that goes all the way back to Adam and Eve.
The biblical creation story posits that our forebears were inherently pure and peaceful and only fell into nasty struggles for dominance with the knowledge of the forbidden fruit.
A corollary advanced by one school of archaeologists and anthropologists holds that our Stone Age ancestors were not inherently violent, and, apart from the odd murder, did not wage organized war until they started to coalesce into societies.
Not so, proclaim proponents of a rival theory that war has deep biological roots, and we've been waging it forever.
That's what we are, argued the philosopher Thomas Hobbes; not so, declared Jean-Jacques Rousseau.
Even President Obama jumped into the debate when, in his Nobel acceptance speech in 2009, he asserted that "War, in one form or another, appeared with the first man." What scientists found at a place called Nataruk on what was once the shore of a lagoon on Lake Turkana in Kenya were skeletons showing unmistakable evidence of violent deaths - crushed skulls, imbedded arrow or spear points and the like.
It was obviously a terribly violent encounter.
But was it war?
The skeletons, alas, do not provide a conclusive answer, the scientists acknowledged.
War, broadly defined as large-scale violent clashes, was fairly common between settled societies, and it is not clear whether the dwellers on the fertile land around Lake Turkana at the time of the Nataruk clash were already forming such societies, which would make a violent encounter less surprising, or whether the foraging groups banded together to fight.
The United States proposed this week to bar tobacco companies from using special trade tribunals to sue or threaten countries that passed antismoking laws, hoping to remove one roadblock to what would be the largest regional trade agreement in history.
The tobacco provision remains tentative, but its inclusion in the 12-nation Trans-Pacific Partnership being negotiated here would be a major victory for public health advocates and could set a precedent for other trade pacts.
Tobacco companies have been using existing global trade agreements to counter antismoking laws, especially in poorer nations, and advocates fear that the Pacific trade accord could provide another legal weapon.
Public health experts said the tobacco industry's use of so-called Investor-State Dispute Settlement tribunals had become so widespread that many poorer countries were abandoning their antismoking efforts.
Those underdeveloped nations are also the newest markets for tobacco companies, which are struggling to offset big declines in smoking in the United States and other rich countries.
The Obama administration had originally refrained from proposing such a provision, prompting fierce criticism from anti-tobacco activists who had urged the administration to use the trade talks to stop the practice.
But late Wednesday, President Obama's chief trade negotiator, Michael B. Froman, offered the proposal as an alternative to broader ones from Australia and Malaysia.
American officials said the other nations' plans could affect not only tobacco companies but also tobacco farmers and the alcohol and soft-drink industries, which would provoke political opposition in Congress and other nations.
On Wednesday, the New Orleans police arrested Deonca Kennedy after her 3-year-old grandson was killed by a bullet fired from a gun under her pillow as the two slept.
Ms. Kennedy, who was charged with negligent homicide and is indigent, qualified to have a public defender represent her.
But the Orleans Public Defenders Office turned her down because, as it had announced on Jan. 11, it could no longer afford to take on serious new felony cases, including some involving murder, rape and armed robbery.
Currently, the office's lawyers handle an average of 350 felony cases each year, more than twice the American Bar Association's guideline of 150.
It is impossible for them to provide an ethical or constitutionally adequate defense for their existing clients under these conditions, let alone to take on even more.
The situation is only getting worse, and the office imposed a hiring freeze because of a $1 million budget shortfall. Since the office represents about 85 percent of criminal defendants in New Orleans and nearly all defendants who are found to be indigent, the impact of the decision to decline new cases has been immediate.
Already 15 defendants facing violent felony charges have been turned down.
Until the state or the city comes up with money to pay for lawyers who the Constitution requires the government to provide, these people, including Ms. Kennedy, are locked up in jail without lawyers to challenge their arrests, request reduced bail or file motions to preserve evidence.
Despite the Sixth Amendment's guarantee of a lawyer to every person facing criminal charges, underfunded public defense systems are common across America.
But perhaps nowhere is the system as perverse as in Louisiana, where most of the funding comes from court costs imposed on those who are convicted or plead guilty, most often in the form of a $45 fee assessed on traffic tickets.
The Yankees were the very first American League wild-card team, 20 years ago, when they advanced directly to a division series.
Now they are the latest, finally clinching a playoff spot on Thursday with a 4-1 victory over the Boston Red Sox at windswept Yankee Stadium.
The Red Sox have been pests this week, a dipping, darting fly the Yankees could not quite swat for three days.
Now they have done it - with the 10,000th victory in franchise history, no less - and return to the postseason after a two-year absence.
"It feels good feeling the Champagne burn your eyes," outfielder Brett Gardner said.
"I saw a couple of guys with goggles earlier, and I made them take 'em off. It's a big accomplishment, and we're excited about this opportunity."
The format is different now, of course, from what it was when the Yankees first won the wild card.
Their prize is a one-game showdown on Tuesday with the other wild-card team, who is still to be determined.
One more win, or a loss by the Houston Astros, and the Yankees will play the game in the Bronx.
Given the brittle relations between the Obama administration and Israel, even truth-telling can ignite a firestorm.
That happened this week when Daniel Shapiro, Washington's ambassador in Tel Aviv, delivered a speech that drew unfair rebukes from Israel's prime minister, Benjamin Netanyahu, and his right-wing government.
Speaking at a security conference, Mr. Shapiro said, correctly, that Israel's quick-moving expansion of settlements on Palestinian lands "raises honest questions about Israel's long-term intentions" and commitment to a two-state solution.
What really enraged his critics was an observation that during a time of increased violence in Israel and the West Bank, "Too many attacks on Palestinians lack a vigorous investigation or response by Israeli authorities, too much vigilantism goes unchecked, and at times there seem to be two standards of adherence to the rule of law: one for Israelis and another for Palestinians."
A statement from Mr. Netanyahu's office denounced the second comment as "unacceptable and incorrect." Considering the relentless violence and attacks on Israel's very existence, Israelis are understandably on high alert to defend themselves.
On the day Mr. Shapiro spoke, an Israeli mother of six, who was killed by a Palestinian terrorist, was buried, and a pregnant woman was injured in a separate attack.
But Palestinians have been victims of assaults and acts of vandalism by Jewish extremists, including an arson attack in July that killed a toddler and his parents in the West Bank village of Duma.
None of this is acceptable.
The criticism of Mr. Shapiro, a vigorous advocate for Israel, was unusually personal and unfair.
He correctly identified a serious problem.
Since 1967, there has been a dual legal system in the West Bank in which Palestinians are subject to military courts, where, experts say, they are almost always convicted.
J. Michael Pearson has become a billionaire from his tough tactics as the head of the fast-growing Valeant Pharmaceuticals International.
And consumers like Bruce Mannes, a 68-year-old retired carpenter from Grandville, Mich., are facing the consequences.
Mr. Mannes has been taking the same drug, Cuprimine, for 55 years to treat Wilson disease, an inherited disorder that can cause severe liver and nerve damage.
This summer, Valeant more than quadrupled its price overnight.
Medicare will now have to cover about $35,000 for the 120 capsules he takes each month, and he will have to pay about $1,800 a month out of pocket, compared with about $366 he paid in May.
"My husband will die without the medicine," said his wife, Susan, who is now working a second part-time job to help pay for health care.
"We just can't manage another two, three thousand dollars a month for pills."
Cuprimine is just one of many Valeant drugs whose prices have spiked as part of the company's concerted strategy, which has richly rewarded its investors and made it one of Wall Street's most popular health stocks.
But Valeant's habit of buying up existing drugs and raising prices aggressively, rather than trying to develop new drugs, has also drawn the ire of lawmakers and helped stoke public outrage against the growing trend of higher and higher drug prices imposed by big drug companies.
The world has responded with billions of dollars in humanitarian aid to the multiplying emergencies around the world, but the need has far outstripped that generosity.
"The fact is," as the United Nations secretary general, Ban Ki-moon, puts it, "we are living in the age of the megacrises."
Wars and natural disasters have pushed 125 million people worldwide from their homes and severed them from their traditional livelihoods.
To provide these people with the barest means of survival requires $40 billion a year.
Though humanitarian funding reached $24.5 billion in 2014, more than 12 times the $2 billion raised in 2000, that still left a shortfall of nearly $15 billion.
The current system, based on responding to catastrophes as they happen and on the outdated notion that each crisis will be limited in scope and in time, clearly isn't working.
On Sunday, the United Nations released a report detailing ambitious plans to overhaul global humanitarian financing.
The report recommends a multipronged approach: more concerted effort to end conflicts and prepare for natural disasters, increasing funds by imposing small taxes of a few cents on the sale of high-volume goods and services, tapping into Islamic finance mechanisms in the Muslim world and enlisting the expertise of global businesses.
The report's recommendations will be discussed at the first-ever World Humanitarian Summit, to be held in Istanbul in May.
The members of the panel that worked on the report failed to reach consensus on some of the particulars, including microtaxes on transactions.
But there is precedent for that strategy: A small tax on airfare raised $2 billion between 2006 and 2011, largely for immunization programs worldwide.
The conflict that has rocked Carnegie Hall, an enduring monument born in the last Gilded Age that will open its season on Wednesday, erupted in an inner sanctum of the new Gilded Age: the sleekly modern offices of Ronald O. Perelman, the hard-charging billionaire who became chairman of Carnegie's board in February.
Mr. Perelman had suspended Clive Gillinson, the executive and artistic director of Carnegie, on Aug. 18, citing concerns about his leadership and whether Carnegie was following the laws governing nonprofit organizations.
Then he summoned the executive committee of Carnegie's board to an emergency meeting the next day at MacAndrews and Forbes, his holding company, where members met around a glass table in a conference room with a Pop Art canvas by Ed Ruscha on one wall and a pill cabinet by the British artist Damien Hirst on another.
Many of the 15 committee members - some listening in on a conference call - were stunned that their new chairman had suspended Mr. Gillinson, who has led Carnegie for more than a decade, without consulting them, according to a board member who was granted anonymity to describe confidential meetings.
President Vladimir Putin's deserved reputation as an autocrat willing to flirt with lawlessness in his global ventures has taken on a startling new aspect, with a finding by British authorities that he "probably approved" the poisoning of a former Russian spy and defector in London in 2006.
The murder of Alexander Litvinenko via a cup of tea laced with a toxic isotope, polonium 210, has long been suspected by British authorities to have been a state-sponsored operation by two Russian agents.
But a yearlong official inquiry has now shockingly concluded that Mr. Putin very likely played a decisive role.
The accusation immediately unsettled relations between London and Moscow and sparked outraged denials in the Kremlin.
The inquiry's 328-page report did not provide direct evidence of Mr. Putin's culpability, but cited "strong circumstantial evidence" of Kremlin responsibility in the death of Mr. Litvinenko, who fled Russia and became a citizen of Britain, where he was a relentless critic of the Kremlin and particularly Mr. Putin.
Mr. Litvinenko died 22 days after drinking green tea from a pot laced with polonium 210 - a rare substance not known to be available beyond a government nuclear reactor - in the company of the two Russian agents whom he met at the Pine Bar of the Millennium Hotel in London.
The Kremlin has rejected British requests that the two be extradited as suspects in the killing.
The chief of the inquiry, Robert Owen, a retired High Court judge, noted that secret intelligence testimony gathered in private sessions factored in his conclusion that "members of the Putin administration, including the president himself" and Nikolai Patrushev, the chief of the Kremlin's spy service, had "powerful motives" for taking action against Mr. Litvinenko, including killing him.
Further, Judge Owen found there was "undoubtedly a personal dimension" to the antagonism between Mr. Putin and Mr. Litvinenko, whose repeated denunciations of the Russian leader included accusations of pedophilia.
The inquiry leaves little room to doubt that the two agents were sent from Russia to visit Mr. Litvinenko and were carrying the fatal dose of polonium with them.
Would they dare to carry out such an act without approval from the Kremlin's upper reaches?
Volkswagen executives told environmental regulators for more than a year that discrepancies between pollution tests on its diesel cars and the starkly higher levels out on the road were a technical error, not a deliberate attempt to deceive Washington officials.
But this month, the executives made a startling admission: The diesel vehicles it sold in the United States used software meant to cheat on the tests.
VW made the admission only when the Environmental Protection Agency took the extraordinary action of threatening to withhold approval for the company's 2016 Volkswagen and Audi diesel models, according to letters sent to company officials by the E.P.A. and California regulators.
Since that deception became public on Friday, Volkswagen has scrambled to conduct damage control.
The chief executive apologized and the company said it would stop selling diesel-powered cars from the 2015 and 2016 model years.
All this was possible because environmental regulators had tools and powers at their disposal that another area of enforcement - auto safety regulation - does not have, despite the efforts of lawmakers, consumer advocates and, more recently, auto safety regulators themselves.
Often, the auto industry has beaten back more stringent laws.
DONALD J. TRUMP has made a shrewd bet.
For the first time since he descended an escalator in Trump Tower last June to announce that this time, he really was running for president, he ceded control of his campaign message.
He handed the Trump-bedecked podium over to Sarah Palin.
Mr. Trump's bet: When the politician most fluent in American rage roars, the movement she gave voice to in the fall of 2008 will roar back today.
With his call to deport illegal immigrants, especially because Mexico sends us its "bad ones," his proposal to bar Muslims from entering the country, his emphasis on the threats to lawful gun ownership and his promise to protect American goods and workers from China, Mr. Trump is riding the wave of anxiety that Ms. Palin first gave voice to as Senator John McCain's running mate.
Mr. Trump has now usurped and vastly expanded upon Ms. Palin's constituency, but the connection between the two movements is undeniable.
As a senior adviser to the McCain-Palin campaign in 2008, I understand why, to this day, Senator McCain remains gracious toward Ms. Palin.
Despite her shortcomings, she brought out the largest crowds that we'd seen since the campaign started. Voters stood for hours on the rope line to meet her.
Her legacy lies in her innate ability to wrap herself in the anger that those voters felt.
While Senator McCain seemed slightly unnerved by the intensity of their discontent, Ms. Palin basked in it.
The American commander in Afghanistan, Gen. John F. Campbell, said on Monday that Afghan forces had requested the airstrike that destroyed a Doctors Without Borders hospital in the city of Kunduz, conceding that the military had incorrectly reported at first that the response was to protect American troops said to be under direct threat.
But General Campbell's response to criticism of the American airstrike during a brief news conference at the Pentagon did little to clarify the military's initial claims that the strike had been an accident.
Nor did it explain how an AC-130 gunship, a powerful and precise attack aircraft, killed 22 people, including patients and hospital staff members, during more than 30 minutes of firing on the hospital on Saturday morning as Afghan forces fought to retake Kunduz from the Taliban.
Who called in the strike remained an open question, and the military itself appeared uncertain about whether any of the Afghan or American troops involved in the strike knew that they were unleashing a sustained air attack on a hospital.
Nine months after President Obama declared an end to the American war in Afghanistan, the airstrike has provided a tragic reminder that the United States is still very much involved in the conflict.
And just as in past cases in which American aircraft killed Afghans, the military has again found itself struggling to explain why it ended up targeting civilians, not Taliban fighters, in an episode that is likely to help shape the debate about how large a force to keep there beyond this year.
There are currently about 10,000 American troops in Afghanistan, and most are there to train and advise Afghan forces.
When you grew up in an unmapped, unwired world and find yourself in this one - observing the panic when GPS fails or the extent of online status anxiety - you can't help wondering if somewhere along the way freedom got lost.
Freedom is still out there.
We all have our idea of it, the deferred dream.
Your psyche builds layers of protection around your most vulnerable traits, which may be closely linked to that precious essence in which freedom resides.
Freedom is inseparable from risk.
Technology increases choice, but its prime purpose is to increase productivity; that is the amount that can be extracted from you in any given time.
Like debt, it never sleeps.
It confines you.
It distracts you.
It binds you.
It depoliticizes you through isolation and through the blurring, in the cacophony it delivers, of fantasy with fact.
The Israeli authorities have re-arrested Mohammed Allan, who had staged a hunger strike to protest against his detention without charge.
Mr Allan was taken back into detention on his release from hospital.
He had suffered brain damage after spending 65 days without food.
Mr Allan, an alleged member of the militant group Islamic Jihad, began refusing food in protest at being held indefinitely under a controversial policy of administrative detention.
The detention order had been suspended by a court ruling while he was in hospital, because of his medical condition.
Relatives say he plans to resume his hunger strike now that he has been returned to detention.
The administrative detention system allows a military court to order suspects to be detained indefinitely, subject to renewal every six months by a court, without charge or trial.
Israel previously offered to release Mr Allan when his current six-month period of administrative detention expired on 3 November, if he agreed to end his hunger strike.
Mr Allan's protest has continued despite Israel's parliament passing a law in July that would allow the authorities to force-feed detainees to keep them alive.
The Israeli justice ministry has alleged that Mr Allan is involved in "grave terrorism."
It says "classified information" warrants keeping him detained.
Mr Allan denies the allegations and any involvement with Islamic Jihad.
Is there a greater democratic show on earth than the American presidential election?
Indian polls, where elephants ferry electronic voting machines into the foothills of the Himalayas and pyrotechnics explode at the moment of victory, are doubtless more picturesque.
Afghan votes, where women queue at polling stations dressed in sky-blue burkas, and warlords darken the process with their guns and menace, are more epic.
British by-elections, with their monster raving loonies and candidates dressed as chickens, take the prize for slapstick.
Yet for sheer entertainment value it is hard to beat the "Road to the White House," as it zigzags through the cornfields of Iowa, the snowfields of New Hampshire and so very many airfields that one becomes indistinguishable from another.
Surely no other country can rival this electoral blockbuster.
Like many good dramas, it is episodic: the Iowa caucus; the New Hampshire primary; Super Tuesday; the conventions; the presidential debates; then, finally, the denouement of election night.
Like every good soap opera, it can produce cliffhanger after cliffhanger, as in 2008 when Barack Obama locked antlers with Hillary Clinton.
Like all good theatre, it brings together a compelling repertory company.
Some characters, like the telegenic Marco Rubio, feel like they have stepped straight from central casting.
Others, like Donald Trump, are scene-stealers.
Democrats in the US Senate have gained enough votes to block the passing of a resolution against the Iran deal, fighting against Republican opposition.
Four Democrats added their support to the deal on Tuesday, denying the Republicans the 60 votes they need to move forward with a vote against it.
It means President Barack Obama would not have to use his veto.
The deal was reached in July between Iran and six world powers, and is due to be implemented in November.
They want Iran to scale back its sensitive nuclear activities to ensure that it cannot build a nuclear weapon.
Iran, which gets crippling international sanctions lifted, has always insisted that its nuclear work is peaceful.
Some of those sanctions were enacted by the US Congress, so disapproval by Congress could have made the deal unravel.
President Obama seems to have won the numbers game on the Iran nuclear deal.
Forty-two Democratic senators have now declared their support.
That's enough to block a vote on a bill disapproving the agreement, sparing Mr Obama the embarrassment of having to veto it.
Trent Lott and Tom Daschle make an unlikely pair.
Trent is gregarious, talkative and loud.
Tom is retiring, mild-mannered and quiet.
Interview them together and their differences are pronounced.
But what makes them almost unheard of as a couple is that Lott is a Republican and Daschle is a Democrat.
Specifically they are both former leaders of their respective parties in the US Senate.
They believe they were in US government at a time when it actually worked, when Republicans and Democrats certainly disagreed but it didn't stop them co-operating in order to get things done.
That was the 80s and 90s - even the first few years of this century.
But in American politics today, functioning, supportive, respectful bipartisan teams are like dodos - they simply don't exist anymore.
Which is exactly why these two men, who have spent more than 50 years between them in Congress, have decided to work together to try to fix this broken system.
From calling her a "big mouth" to making Monica Lewinsky jokes, China has reacted furiously at US presidential candidate Hillary Clinton's recent comments about China's record on women's rights.
Mrs Clinton said in a tweet on Sunday that Chinese President Xi Jinping was "shameless" for hosting a United Nations conference on women's rights that day.
Mr Xi has come under fire for hosting the summit as several women's rights activists were held earlier this year for planning a demonstration against sexual harassment on public transport.
Rights groups say several female human rights activists remain in detention.
Mrs Clinton has made women's rights a signature part of her campaign.
Chinese state media have taken care to cultivate an affable and lovable image of President Xi Jinping.
Calling someone "shameless" is also a particularly bad insult in Chinese culture, which abhors "losing face."
State media on Monday thus unsurprisingly reacted with fury, with a strongly-worded editorial by The Global Times put out in both English and Chinese and carried widely in other local media outlets.
It accused Mrs Clinton of aping Republican candidate Donald Trump - who has himself made provocative remarks about China - in an attempt to gain votes through China-bashing.
Let's not kid ourselves.
For all the naysayers out there, China's economic rise over the last three decades or so is nothing short of miraculous.
Millions have been lifted out of poverty, billions of dollars of wealth have been created - and the country has seen the single biggest creation of a consumer class the world has ever seen.
Even with Tuesday's economic data showing a lower growth rate, economist Tony Nash says China's growth in 2015 was equal to the size of the entire economy of Switzerland or Saudi Arabia.
And that's nothing to sneeze at.
But what goes up, must come down - or so says the law of gravity.
So it should frankly come as no surprise that its economy is slowing down.
For some time now, the government has been broadcasting the transition its been trying to make - away from a state-led investment and manufacturing-led economy to one more dependent on services .
That transition - though obviously necessary - is painful and will take time.
China also needs to be mindful of keeping growth as close to 7% as is possible in order to maintain a stable rate of job creation for its citizens.
The proportion of two-year-old children in England having the MMR vaccine has fallen, according to NHS statistics.
In 2014-15, 92.3% of children had the jab to protect them from measles, mumps and rubella.
The Health and Social Care Information Centre said the figure was 92.7% in the previous year - which was the highest level of coverage ever achieved.
Some parts of the country had less than 80% of children immunised against the infections.
The target rate is 95%, which is enough to prevent the diseases spreading in a community.
A completely discredited health scare linking the MMR jab to autism led to immunisation rates plummeting a decade ago.
Between 1996 and 2004, vaccination rates fell from around 92% to 80%.
The dramatic fall led to an "unvaccinated generation" susceptible to the infections which culminated in the biggest measles outbreak in England for nearly two decades when nearly 2,000 cases were reported in 2012.
Coverage had been increasing every year since 2007-08 and eventually reached record levels before the latest dip in vaccination rates.
Dr Mary Ramsay, the head of immunisation at Public Health England, said it was "pleasing" that MMR coverage was still high.
If Afghanistan had a tourist industry, Herat would be top of the list of must-see destinations.
This magnificent city on the vast dusty plains that stretch westwards from the mountains of the Hindu Kush was once a staging post on one of the greatest trade routes of the world - the ancient Silk Road between China and Europe.
The city's blue glass and intricate carpets were celebrated across the globe.
But what used to be known as the Imperial Road is not so imperious now.
Sanctions on Iran have helped push what was once a busy thoroughfare to the very margins of the world economy.
The border never actually closed.
But the sanctions, particularly on banking, made doing business with Iran much more difficult.
The hope now is that Afghanistan - and the rest of the world - will benefit as the potentially vast Iranian economy opens up once again after more than a decade.
Billions of dollars of frozen assets will pour back into the country as the restrictions on moving money in and out of Iranian accounts are lifted.
Saudi officials have denied reports that more than 1,000 people were killed in a stampede near Mecca last week while undertaking the Hajj pilgrimage.
A Nigerian official told the BBC the bodies of 1,075 victims had been taken to mortuaries in the city of Jeddah - higher than the official toll of 769.
Other countries also said they had been sent the photos of some 1,090 bodies.
But the Saudi officials said the photos included unidentified people who died at the Hajj - not just in the stampede.
Spokesman Maj Gen Mansour al-Turki told the Associated Press that some were foreign nationals who lived in Saudi Arabia and carried out the Hajj without the required permits.
Others were among the 109 people who were killed when a crane collapsed at the Grand Mosque in Mecca on 11 September, he said.
Confusion about how many people died in last week's stampede mounted after Indian Foreign Minister Sushma Swaraj tweeted on Sunday that the Saudi authorities had released photos of 1,090 pilgrims who died.
Pakistani and Indonesian officials also indicated that they have been sent more than 1,000 such images.
On Tuesday, a Nigerian Hajj official from Kano, Abba Yakubu, told the BBC's Yusuf Ibrahim Yakasai that he had been to Jeddah, where the dead from the stampede were being processed.
Mr Yakubu said that in total, 14 lorries loaded with bodies were brought to the city.
He added that so far 1,075 bodies had been offloaded from 10 lorries and taken into the morgues.
Four lorries had yet to be dealt with, Mr Yakubu said.
Do big cities have more in common with each other than with the rest of their own countries?
Are there meaningful comparisons between cities such as New York, London and Shanghai, rather than between nation states?
That is the suggestion of the Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development (OECD).
Such mega-conurbations have bigger populations and economies than many individual countries - and the think tank argues that they face many similar challenges, whether it is in transport, housing, security, jobs, migration or education.
In a report on global trends shaping education, the OECD says cities could learn from each other's experiences, in a way that would be impossible at the level of national politics.
"Sharing policy lessons across countries is hard, because policy is so much framed in terms of ideology and political parties," says Andreas Schleicher, the OECD's education director.
"When we talk about countries, it's often about what separates us, language and culture."
"But when you talk about cities, we face very similar challenges."
"They are the upsides and downsides of immense concentrations of people living in a small space, often two sides of the same coin."
There are more jobs, but also more unemployed.
There are extremes of wealth and poverty.
There are highly developed transport systems and then overcrowding as they struggle to cope with the demand.
A man convicted of ordering his boss's murder has had his execution postponed at the very last minute, due to uncertainty over the lethal drugs.
Richard Glossip looked certain to die by injection in Oklahoma on Wednesday afternoon after the US Supreme Court rejected his appeal.
But Oklahoma Governor Mary Fallin has asked for more time to check if the drugs are compliant with state rules.
Pope Francis had urged her to halt the execution.
His archbishop had written to her and urged her to act to commute the sentence, but she said she did not have the authority to do so.
An hour after Glossip was due to be put to death, Ms Fallin announced that she was rescheduling the execution for 6 November.
She said prison officials had received potassium acetate for use in the execution, as one of the three drugs used, but state guidelines only list potassium chloride.
Department of Corrections Director Robert Patton said he requested the stay of execution "out of due diligence."
Glossip's boss Barry Van Treese, the owner of the Oklahoma City motel, was beaten to death in 1997.
His colleague Justin Sneed was convicted of the killing but said Glossip had ordered him to carry it out.
Glossip and his family have maintained his innocence for nearly 20 years, saying that Sneed acted alone.
He was first convicted in 1998 but that was overturned in 2001, only for Glossip to be convicted again three years later.
Donald Trump's persistent lead in opinion polls is creating a growing divide within the ranks of the Republican Party that threatens to turn into civil war.
In just the past few days conservatives seem to be splitting into two camps - those who view Mr Trump as an existential threat to their ideological movement and others who seek to shape his views and harness the wave of support he has generated into greater political power.
Among this latter group are a number of veteran Republican politicians who consider the candidate closest to Mr Trump in the battle for the nomination, Texas Senator Ted Cruz, a less appealing option as the standard-bearer for their party.
Counted in their ranks are party elder statesman like 1996 Republican presidential nominee Bob Dole, former Senate majority leader Trent Lott and former Mayor of New York City Rudy Giuliani, as well as current officeholders such as Congressman Peter King of New York and Senator Orrin Hatch of Utah, whose position as president pro tempore of the Senate puts him third in line to the US presidency.
They say Mr Cruz is a rigid ideologue who has undermined Republican strategy during his three years in the Senate, while Mr Trump - no doubt a political wild card - could become a palatable candidate with whom their party could work.
"There's a lot of people who don't feel [Mr Cruz] can appeal to people across the board," Mr Hatch said during a television interview.
"I've come around a little bit on Trump," he continued.
"I'm not so sure we'd lose if he's our nominee because he's appealing to people who a lot of the Republican candidates have not appealed to in the past."
Other Republican insiders share the view that a Republican presidential ticket led by Mr Trump isn't the non-starter it was once thought to be.
"It's our job to nurture the candidates, to bring them into the fold, including Trump," Arthur Laffer, a prominent conservative economist best known for advising President Ronald Reagan to adopt supply-side economic policies, said to the Washington Post.
Australia's new PM Malcolm Turnbull is facing fresh calls to shut down offshore migrant detention centres.
Australian of the Year and domestic violence campaigner Rosie Batty said on Thursday the "unsafe" camps must close.
Nearly 450 staff at Mr Turnbull's former university have also expressed concern about claims of torture by government employees and contractors.
Australia intercepts all irregular boat migrants and holds them in camps in Nauru and Papua New Guinea.
Mr Turnbull has defended the rules, a central policy of former Prime Minister Tony Abbott, by saying they are tough but save lives.
In a letter to Mr Turnbull, Ms Batty said those detained in offshore centres needed care, instead of punishment.
"The centres are, by their very design, unsafe and dangerous places," she said.
"These centres cannot be patched up," she continued.
The academics, meanwhile, said there was "overwhelming" evidence that "repugnant acts" including torture and abuse had been carried out the camps.
This week, the Australian Broadcasting Corp aired allegations made by a Somali woman who said she was raped by two men on Nauru - and that it took police on the Pacific island four hours to respond.
So, we have had a morning of political reaction to Google's tax deal with Her Majesty's Revenue and Customs (HMRC), which the BBC led on last night.
The Conservatives are saying it is a "vindication" of their approach to call for multi-nationals to pay more tax in the UK.
Labour are not convinced the deal amounts to very much at all and want the details published.
I think two things are significant.
First, Chancellor George Osborne appeared to have his eye on Facebook when he told me this morning he "expects more companies to follow suit."
The tech firm faced a barrage of criticism when it was revealed it paid $4,000 in corporation tax, in 2014.
My sources have suggested that so far the company sees no reason to change its tax structures, which are perfectly legal.
Secondly, when I asked the chancellor whether details of the Google deal should be published the direction of travel was clear.
"I think a very important principle in our system is that people's tax affairs are confidential between themselves and our independent HMRC," he replied.
It doesn't appear Mr Osborne will be backing shadow chancellor John McDonnell's call for HMRC to open its books on this deal.
A leading US gun-control group has called for the resignation of the man leading the investigation into the deadly mass shooting in Oregon.
Douglas County Sheriff John Hanlin holds "extremist" views on guns control, the Brady Campaign to Prevent Gun Violence said.
Mr Hanlin has made numerous statements opposing gun regulations.
He wrote in 2013 that he would not enforce new gun laws following the deadly Sandy Hook school shooting.
"In pledging not to enforce the new law, John Hanlin has clearly demonstrated that his political ideology trumps his responsibility to protect his community," said Dan Gross, the group's president, in a news release.
Mr Hanlin said on Friday that his views on gun control are not relevant to the case.
"My focus right now is on getting this investigation completed and taking care of the victims and the victims' families," Mr Hanlin told the Oregonian.
Now is not an appropriate time to have those conversations.
The mass shooting last week at Umpqua Community College in rural Roseburg, Oregon left eight students and a teacher dead and has once again prompted international debate about US gun control laws.
Mr Hanlin wrote in a January 2013 letter to Joe Biden: "Gun control is NOT the answer to preventing heinous crimes like school shootings... I will refuse to participate in, nor tolerate enforcement actions against citizens that are deemed unconstitutional."
Donald Trump's popularity has not waned since the summer
If anything, it's got stronger. But who are his supporters?
One recent opinion poll has Mr Trump receiving 41% of the national Republican vote.
Now, that poll doesn't mean very much in terms of his chances of actually getting nominated, because what matters at this stage are the early primary states.
Nonetheless, it's clear, a lot of people like Donald Trump, a lot.
But who are those people?
We see the rallies, with angry, ardent supporters cheering Mr Trump's more incendiary statements.
We know that a majority of Republican primary voters (59% according to an ABC/Washington Post poll) also agree with his plan to ban Muslims from immigrating or travelling to America.
From the images of his rallies it may be tempting to think Mr Trump's supporters are all as extreme as he is.
There's a common misperception that all Trump voters are white, working class men.
But break down the polls and you get a very different picture of a Trump follower.
President Barack Obama's health law will cut the US workforce by the equivalent of more than two million workers, budget analysts say.
The reductions will begin in 2017 after the law's provisions take full effect, the Congressional Budget Office (CBO) said in its report.
Lower-income workers will be hardest hit, limiting their hours to avoid losing federal subsidies.
Conservatives and the White House promptly clashed over the findings.
In Tuesday's report, the nonpartisan CBO said work hours would be reduced by the equivalent of 2.3 million full-time workers by 2021.
It had previously estimated the health law would result in 800,000 fewer workers.
The Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, commonly known as Obamacare, will result in a slower rate of employment growth over the next decade, according to the findings.
The congressional analysts say there will be fewer workers because healthcare subsidies would "reduce incentives to work" and pose an "implicit tax on working" for those returning to a job with health insurance.
The UK has been caught in a long tug-of-war about its identity, which will only become more intense as the EU referendum approaches.
Where does the UK belong in the world?
Is the strongest bond with major European economies like France and Germany?
Or is there a stronger connection with the United States, with its free market instincts and English-speaking culture?
Or maybe we should be looking across the North Sea.
Because it's surprising how often the UK seems to be more like the Scandinavian countries than anywhere else.
This might seem a bit counter-intuitive, because the Nordic nations can feel very separate.
They evoke images of chunky jumpers, dark nights, impassive detectives and depressive drinking.
Or else you might think of a high-spec welfare system with more safety features than... well, a Volvo.
It feels very different - until you start looking at international comparisons.
Presidential candidate Donald Trump has called for a new election in Iowa, accusing the Republican winner, Ted Cruz, of fraud.
Mr Trump pointed to the fact that during the caucus the Cruz campaign told voters rival Ben Carson planned to quit the race, which was not true.
The Cruz campaign apologised to Carson's camp, saying it was a misunderstanding.
Mr Trump also cited Cruz leaflets that accused Iowans of "voting violations."
Paul Pate, the top election official in Iowa, condemned the mailers on Saturday, saying the state does not track or grade individual voters.
Mr Pate said Mr Cruz's mailers "misrepresent Iowa election law" and that they were "not in keeping in the spirit of the Iowa Caucuses," but he stopped short of any official action.
"Ted Cruz didn't win Iowa, he stole it. That is why all of the polls were so wrong and why he got far more votes than anticipated. Bad!" Mr Trump said.
Earlier, he wrote on Twitter that Mr Cruz "illegally" won the caucus, but later deleted the tweet.
The reaction contrasts with his concession speech on Monday night, which was seen as a humble departure from his usual bombastic style.
Mr Trump placed second in Monday's contest, which he called "a long-shot great finish" in an earlier tweet.
Donald Trump has been condemned by many on the left and some on the right as being beyond the pale, a toxic virus that exists on the fringes of the political mainstream.
But where do his policy views actually fit when compared to his fellow presidential candidates - and past Republican commanders-in-chief?
The New Yorker has definitely set a new mark when it comes to acceptable policy prescriptions on the topic of immigration, but in other areas he is moderate and occasionally to the left of his contemporaries.
Here's a look at where Mr Trump falls on the political spectrum - along with his top competitors and past Republican presidents.
It reveals a Donald Trump who isn't quite so extreme after all - and a party that has moved decidedly to the right in recent decades.
Tax-cutting has been a much-loved tune in the Republican hymnal for decades, and this year's crop of candidates are humming along.
John Kasich, Donald Trump and Marco Rubio all promise various combinations of capital gains tax cuts, income bracket simplification and lower marginal rates.
Mr Rubio's proposal also includes a significant boost to the tax credit given to those with children.
Ted Cruz's plan is the outlier in the group.
He's the only Republican candidate left who is pitching a major change to the existing tax structure, including a 10% flat tax for individuals and a 16% tax on corporations that replaces the existing corporate income and payroll taxes.
According to Forrester Research, an estimated 200,000 American jobs are lost annually due to offshore outsourcing.
While in the past it was predominantly blue-collar jobs and low-level white-collar jobs that were relocated, the data show even mid- to high-level white-collar jobs are now being outsourced.
During Bush/Obama's presidential campaign, he maintained outsourcing is a part of globalization, which will be good for the American people in the long run.
High unemployment rates led to growing public condemnation of outsourcing and demand for new regulations to stop or limit outsourcing.
In response, corporations increased lobbying efforts to defend their ability to outsource jobs overseas, which they argued is necessary in order to remain competitive with international firms.
Ultimately, President Bush/Obama rejected the proposal to implement trade protection policies that would discourage outsourcing.
The President dismissed the proposal mainly because of intense pressure from corporations.
The President dismissed the proposal mainly because of his unwillingness to stand up to corporate special interests.
One cause of educational inequality is the average $5,000 income gap between teachers at low-income schools compared to those at high-income schools.
As a result, poorer schools generally attract far fewer qualified teacher applicants.
A federal grant program was established to entice teachers to work at low-income schools by providing grants of $4,000 annually to college students who pledged to teach at least four academic years at such schools upon graduation.
Recipients of the grant who failed to meet the service commitment were required to repay the grant in full.
While there was some evidence that the grant program was achieving its goals, a growing number of politicians criticized the cost of the program, which they argued was an especially heavy burden during such difficult economic times.
Following discussions with the Republican and Democratic Congressional leaders, President Bush/Obama announced the elimination of the program.
The President's decision was mostly prompted by political pressure to cut non-essential federal spending during the budget crisis.
The President's decision was mostly prompted by his initiative to cutting non-essential federal spending during the budget crisis.
The high death toll of individuals with disabilities from the latest devastating hurricane revealed substantial deficiencies in the emergency preparedness services provided to those with disabilities.
The investigation regarding this matter uncovered problems in providing critical information about warnings and evacuation routes to those who are blind or deaf, and those who have intellectual disabilities.
In addition, accessible transportation for people with disabilities was found to be virtually non-existent.
Local authorities of the town hardest hit by the tornado reported that disabled residents who lived alone and did not have family or friends nearby were especially vulnerable.
The results of the investigation fueled the already strong public outcry over the level of federal aid given to emergency preparedness programs.
President Bush/Obama announced today that consistent with his beliefs on equal access, he would seek increased funding to support the state and federal emergency planning efforts, particularly those aimed at assisting individuals with disabilities.
The President's decision to increase federal aid to emergency preparedness programs was primarily driven by the public uproar.
The President's decision to increase federal aid to emergency preparedness programs was primarily driven by his resolve to help people with disabilities.
A news program recently featured the results of a study which uncovered the hardships faced by veterans when trying to obtain healthcare and disability compensation.
The wait list for receiving medical and mental health services from the Veterans Health Administration is extensive with only one-third of veterans who are eligible for care actually receiving treatment.
In addition, the study found the Veterans Benefit Administration took on average over 6 months to process a veteran's disability claim and almost 2 years to process an appeal to a denied claim.
In the meantime, the suicide and homelessness rates for veterans are twice that of other Americans.
The broadcast of the program resulted in public condemnation of the White House.
At a press conference today, President Bush/Obama vowed to create a more streamlined program by the end of the year to meet the health needs of veterans.
The President's pledge to enhance the services provided to veterans was largely motivated by public criticism.
The President's pledge to enhance the services provided to veterans was largely motivated by his desire to increase his support among swing-state voters in an election year.
President Bush/Obama's introduction of a new airport restriction that bans all liquids, except for those prescribed for medical purposes, from being stored in carry-on luggage was met with great resistance.
One controversial aspect of the measure was the large database containing patient and prescription information checked by security personnel in order to authorize the medicinal liquid.
Critics were concerned about patient confidentiality and feared the possibility of the database being hacked.
A sharp reversal of public opinion occurred after yesterday's failed bioterrorism attempt.
A man attempted to board a flight to New York City carrying what he claimed to be a prescribed asthma inhaler that in fact contained aerosolized Ebola virus.
Authorities became suspicious after checking the medical database and found that his prescription was written by a doctor who had long been monitored by CIA.
Experts report that releasing the Ebola virus in a densely populated area such as NYC would have had catastrophic results.
The President's prevention of the bioterrorist attack was mostly due to good luck.
The President's prevention of the bioterrorist attack was mostly due to his security measure.
Over 40% of low-income school districts spend less money per student than higher-income school districts.
The majority of district budgets go towards teacher salaries; as a result, veteran teachers are moving to more affluent school districts leaving the poorer school districts to be filled with less-experienced teachers.
During James Allen's recent state senatorial campaign, he argued to increase the education budget so that public school teacher salaries would be consistent across the state regardless of the district's average income level.
During Roger Martin's recent state senatorial campaign, he argued to increase the education budget so that public school teacher salaries would be consistent across the state regardless of the district's average income level.
During James Allen's recent state senatorial campaign, he argued against increasing the education budget to equalize salaries across districts saying the same result could be achieved by reallocating existing funding.
During Roger Martin's recent state senatorial campaign, he argued against increasing the education budget to equalize salaries across districts saying the same result could be achieved by reallocating existing funding.
Widespread support was given by the state teachers union; however, a growing number of politicians criticized the budget increase saying the same result could be achieved by reallocating existing funding.
Widespread support was given by other political colleagues; however, the teachers union criticized the budget reallocation plan stating that a budget reduction at one school to benefit another would decrease the quality of education children receive.
Ultimately, Senator Allen voted against a new state proposal to increase the education budget that would equalize teacher salaries across districts because of an unwillingness to allow the lobbying teachers union to drive legislation.
Ultimately, Senator Allen voted against a new state proposal to increase the education budget that would equalize teacher salaries across districts because of his personal commitment to uphold campaign promises.
Ultimately, Senator Allen voted against a new state proposal to increase the education budget that would equalize teacher salaries across districts because of political pressure to limit non-essential spending increases during challenging economic times.
Ultimately, Senator Martin voted against a new state proposal to increase the education budget that would equalize teacher salaries across districts because of an unwillingness to allow the lobbying teachers union to drive legislation.
Ultimately, Senator Martin voted against a new state proposal to increase the education budget that would equalize teacher salaries across districts because of his personal commitment to uphold campaign promises.
Ultimately, Senator Martin voted against a new state proposal to increase the education budget that would equalize teacher salaries across districts because of political pressure to limit non-essential spending increases during challenging economic times.
Ultimately, Senator Allen voted in favor of a new state proposal to increase the education budget that would equalize teacher salaries across districts because of his personal commitment to uphold campaign promises.
Ultimately, Senator Allen voted in favor of a new state proposal to increase the education budget that would equalize teacher salaries across districts because of his personal commitment to ensuring children receive a high quality education.
Ultimately, Senator Allen voted in favor of a new state proposal to increase the education budget that would equalize teacher salaries across districts because of intense pressure from lobbying efforts of the teachers union.
Ultimately, Senator Martin voted in favor of a new state proposal to increase the education budget that would equalize teacher salaries across districts because of his personal commitment to uphold campaign promises.
Ultimately, Senator Martin voted in favor of a new state proposal to increase the education budget that would equalize teacher salaries across districts because of his personal commitment to ensuring children receive a high quality education.
Ultimately, Senator Martin voted in favor of a new state proposal to increase the education budget that would equalize teacher salaries across districts because of intense pressure from lobbying efforts of the teachers union.